I wonder if bush would ever thank a foreign country's scientists / assistance in things unrelated to the conflictory situations with our country. I like that Putin can thank americans in this,  although his view of our government's method are disproving...
it was her brother.
I agree that it is crap to fire department heads for the sin of not using the force of the government to keep you in power.
I got a copy of Tiberian Sun at a Nox release party thing in the city.  That game was utter trash.  As was Nox...
Free grand slam breakfast for anyone successfully amputating their own arm!
You cobble shoes, not Black Berries.  &lt;shakes head&gt;  Now excuse me while I Helmicly Regulate my toaster. Sidebar: I wanted to spell it Black Berrys, since it is a brand name.  I suspect that would have been correct.  However, I am going with "Berries" in direct defiance to our financial lords and masters.  I will have my victory, if only in grammar.  
Ha.  But yeah, fundamentally; it is not possible to be a good politician if you are a zealot.  And joking aside, being Jewish isn't the same as being religious. One can be culturally Jewish without being at all religious.
Interesting. Well, let's hope that online "Logic" class I took comes in handy.
I just thought he was trying to look more like Popeye.
to infineon, and beyond!
No, that's one big neck.
Thinking of how Japanese so determined to get HDTV right and now they are the dominant players in the market, I think they have a very high chance to pull it off again in Robotic market. 
They do this in Germany, too.
You just got trolled!
Zombies.
the link to the photo is in the text of the first response to the article...
God, in infinite wisdom and mercy, is giving Bush a second chance at getting New Orleans right.
Wtf.
CHENEY FLAIR 08
ah, spoken like someone who really has no idea what they're talking about.
Yes, I hope people realized I was joking.  Making up a story is going to work much worse than just keeping your damn mouth shut.  &gt; And since selling a long gun doesn't require paperwork, they won't be able to prove you still have the guns unless they actually find them.  Here in my state (MA), selling any gun requires paperwork, long gun or not.  I could sell out of state, avoiding the state paperwork, but that would require an FFL to be involved, and so there would be federal paperwork.  
the former would atheism.  the latter would be deism.  duh. (not flippant, just frustrated.)
Wow, it's bad when you can tell a story is going to be on OS X's nuts just by the title.  Hey, take a look at this subreddit guys: http://www.reddit.com/r/osfanboyism  Might be a better place for this story.
I never found her particularly attractive what with the upward pointing nipples and leather skin, but that pic of her sitting on the edge of the bed is *fucking hot*. 
I hate EA with a passion.  Add Origin and Bullfrog to your list of thanks.  I will never spend another dime on anything from EA.
All of them or only those who don't help keep the Republicans in power? Palin, it seems, holds the latter view.
Israel has nukes and the world hasn't blown up yet. How can iran be worse?
In Russia, smiling is taken as a sexual advance.
Where's the "horrifying anime scene" of The Rape of Naking? Or Pearl Harbor? Or the Bataan Death March? etc...  Don't start a war if you can't take the consequences.  Right, Dubya?
And here's to that... I think Blair was enough to convince most people that Christians in government are a Bad Thing.
How so very "Tsar" of him. The KGB propaganda machine never rests.
More here  http://wordsmith.org/anagram/anagram.cgi?anagram=Sarah+Palin&amp;t=1000  http://wordsmith.org/anagram/anagram.cgi?anagram=Sarah+Heath+Palin&amp;t=1000
"Group necrophilia - the morgue's the merrier!"
That's the beauty of Web 2.0 and JavaScript! :D
"Directored"?
no TV in Guantanamo
well she did have the life jacket on, i don't think it would be nearly as painful as landing that way with a bare back
yeah, the video had some fake looking moments. the "making of" vid backfired, it only made me sure that it was at least partially faked
What is that gawdawful lump on his jaw?
yeah, although I've never found it particularly enjoyable.  Gimme weed any day over that stuff.
[citation needed]  I mean I dislike this lady as much as the next person, but I find it hard to believe that her ultimate goal is to wipe out bears and wolves so that its only an oil field not a tourist destination.
Stiff hand brush, 50-1 water to bleach. It's 1% detergent, and 99% elbow-grease.
If Obama were from Alaska, had an undergrad journalism degree and was a sports journalist for a short period of time, was governor for 2 years and was under federal investigation, he wouldn't have a chance.
&gt; Scientists fear that the Large Hadron Collider - due to be switched on in just nine days' time - will create a mini-black hole that could swallow the planet.  I don't understand why they didn't try to stop it a decade ago upon its inception.   &gt; Within just four years, one of these 'celestial vacuums' could have swollen to such a size that it is capable of sucking the Earth inside-out, said Otto Rossler, one of a group of scientists mounting a last-minute court challenge against the project. &gt; Professor Rossler, a German chemist, said the European Organisation for Nuclear Research, or CERN, has admitted its project create black holes but doesn't consider them to be a risk. &gt; He warned: 'My own calculations have shown it is quite plausible that these little black holes survive and will grow exponentially and eat the planet from the inside.  Bah. Bollocks.
&gt;Back in 1998, highly illegal sites like Audiofind and MP3.com were giving away artist’s songs quite openly and completely for free in pretty poor-sounding 112 and 128KBps MP3 format, and we were downloading them with our 56K modems - often taking up to half an hour a time. I hope the "legal" part is supposed to be tongue in cheek. There are so many bands that I found out about on MP3.com that I never *ever* would have listened to or paid otherwise.
Also, many more women are lesbians.   (Just kidding.  Sorta.  I have too many experiences with women going lesbian/bi on me.. (and it's not just a made up excuse to break up))
I see girls wearing those around all the time.
So *that's* what that old Foreigner song was all about.
`&gt;_&gt; test`  And I finally found out how to make a Wikipedia link with parentheses work.  Like [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Whenever_You_Need_Somebody_(album\) "Never gonna give you up, never gonna let you down... Never gonna run around and desert you. -- Never gonna make you cry, never gonna say goodbye. Never gonna tell a lie, and hurt you.").  Wikipedia would always cut off the last [parenthesis](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Whenever_You_Need_Somebody_(album "We're no strangers to love... You know the rules, and so do I. -- A full committment's what I'm thinking of. You wouldn't get this from any other guy.")), thinking it was saying it was the end of the link. And what it takes is a \ backslash before the last parenthesis. Drove me nuts for a while, only figured it out on Friday, I think.
Got any good things she has done? So far I have heard that she did "lots" to root out corruption. This "lots" seems to consist of leaving one board because she did not like one guy.
Heavy on the theory -- light on the practical applications.
[Project Gutenberg](http://www.gutenberg.org/wiki/Main_Page)
Seems much more likely to me that the daughter has just not lost her baby weight from her recent pregnancy yet... which one of those two ladies looks like she was pregnant just 4 months ago?
Well don't hold your breath waiting for me to kill myself over this.
That's an example of why he should NOT turn on the news.
I wonder how long a heart could on go if the people who used it were healthy?
I've been clicking on buttons like these for 20 years and the "Cancel" label still makes me do a double-take.  Maybe it's because my brain thinks words like "Cancel," "No" and "Discard" are roughly synonymous. At least in the context of closing a file without saving.  I don't have a great solution, and maybe only my brain hates these dialogs. Although the fact that 4 OSes have arrived at 4 different answers, and people are still blogging and debating it, suggests that other people have the same problem.  One thing would to have a simple 2-possibility dialog. You hit the  Quit or Close button. "Do you want to save? Yes/No" (because you've already obviously elected to quit).  If the person is a dumbass and hits close accidentally, they can always save and open the doc up again. I mean, my web browser doesn't ask me to confirm a close because browsing is read-only and I can always reopen the page.  I do know one thing and it's that a Yes/No question cannot have 3 possible answers!
Well, the odds count for the average person. McCain is theoretically better than average in terms of health care, but he's worse than average in terms of years spent being tortured in Vietnam.
Ah, thank you. I knew I knew the name Palin from somewhere but was too lazy to actually look up where. 
Salty!
Exactly. Because the Bush administration (and others) are hell bent on privatizing everything, our government is becoming a former shell of itself. Unable to provide basic services without the help of private contracts.
McCain just shot his campaign in the foot with his new ditzy VP choice. 
Nice story. Too bad that this was her police chief and she fired him not at the beginning of her term, but during the re-election campaign. And she has made no charges against him except that he was not helping her re-election.
He arrived at his destination. He started formatting himself (he couldn’t be discovered. It was the first and the most important rule: his code must remain secret, always. No exceptions). When he had almost being converted to NULL positions, he managed to finish with his pain, finally. Nobody will never be able to programme him again, he didn’t worth it. Free software had win the battle and now, another era was coming and there was no place for him.
Nice! Her nickname was "Tits McGee"
I made you extinct once and I can do it again.
You can get a Dell Vostro 1510 Laptop with an Intel Core 2 Duo 1.8GHz processor and 15.4" WXGA Anti-Glare, 2GB DDR2, 160GB, 8x DL DVD±RW/±R/CD-RW, Vista Home Basic w/SP1, 802.11g Wi-Fi Internal Card for only $599.00 and Free Shipping.  [Dell](http://configure.us.dell.com/dellstore/config.aspx?oc=BQCW51Z&amp;cs=04&amp;dgvcode=ss&amp;c=US&amp;l=EN&amp;dgc=BF&amp;cid=7420&amp;lid=197374)
I await the anime of the horrible atrocities Japan did during the war. (which include many many many many many civilians)
This is on youtube. We don't need blogspam.
&gt; Yes, blacks tend to be violent.  are you trolling or just really uneducated?
Don't know what Haiku is?  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/BeOS: ... Haiku is a complete reimplementation of the BeOS operating system.
I'm not actually religious; basically I *do* just love my neighbour without adding all the other stuff. I just think that it's kind of silly to fail to recognise that at least some parts of the Bible (and most other religious texts you could care to name) give fairly decent advice on how to live.
perv
I bet you did some hardware design in factor after you met your second wife at factor convention...
Actually, no. They're trying to kill the wolves and bears so that the Ungulate populations in critical areas of the state are able to recover. Predator control has been going on in Alaska for thousands of years. In the past if there were too many wolves the Natives in the area would just go kill the wolves, now they're trying to work with Alaska Dept of Fish and Game and do it above board. With gas prices as high as they are, over 7 a gallon in the villages, it's not feasible to use snow machines to hunt wolves hence the use of airplanes and liberalized bear hunting rules. Palin is supporting the decision reached by the Alaska Board of Game which is a public process.   The predator populations are in very remote areas and are unlikely to be photographed unless you hike several hundred miles to view wildlife. The amount of tourists who experience alaska in this manner is minuscule COMPARED TO THE 10 CRUISE SHIPS which are in Alaskan waters right now, or the trains going through denali park.  
Well the dude asked.
Or Bill Clinton before and after his first term.
I did a google search, but it seemed like only Bush and Delay were coming up.
Why the fuck would you inject cocaine in a Denny's? Gotta get pumped before having their $4.99 "Grand Slam"?
So you think it's cool to be oblivious about issues outside of your immediate surroundings. That's seriously pathetic.
I don't know about that.  They always manage to work me over a bit and then squeeze me dry.
I am with you! I saw Rumsfeld personally chipping away at a levee to help flood the lower 9th ward. 
Well, are they truly endangered or not? 
Microsoft needs to hire this guy to do all their UI.  Four distinct letters, total, on all the buttons, and it's easiest dialog to figure out so far.
We'll still hear that this is God's Will because McCain isn't "conservative" enough. 
When did the Stupid take over this site?
That was democrats fault...  Look who they put up against Bush...  Al "lock box" Gore  John "Listen to me bore and confuse anyone listening" Kerry  It is yet to be determined if Barack can overcome GOP.  It seems like a no brainer.  8 years of Bush and republican House and Senate that WILL lose more seats.  If he doesn't win that will be one of the most epic fails in our history.  It will be like JFK again but in reverse.
A person would be defined as a living human being.
Log in required? what is this?
I had to do it uphill. In the snow. Both ways.
&gt;You Obama supporters don`t have a leg to stand on about the inexperience,Obama could be president and he has 173 days experience-think about it!! &gt; &gt;Palin has 16 yrs. Look it up.  If you were in love with reality, you might figure out how to access [Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Obama), which shows Obama with 7 years experience as a state legislator and over 3 years experience as a senator: 7 years at the state level and 3 at the federal level as opposed to Palin's mere 2 years at the state level.
Who do you think is going to support your aging population?
&gt; "consciousness" does mean something  But it has nothing to do with AI.  &gt; you are making an hypothesis  No, dradetsky is defining AI objectively in terms of information processing, defining consciousness as a subjective phenomenon, and pointing out that the concepts are unrelated.
LOL, how quickly you forget
I'm not liking the instrument cluster, but I'm a classicist, analog gauges &gt; digital readout.
Did that gerbil 'give you the eye'? ;)
There are no limits...god bless the Onion.
admit it- the persistence has nothing to do with it. you're just trying to save face.
I like people better than bears. If you are serious, you're a sociopath not a social democrat.
damn i wanna be a redneck now
You know, I could have sworn one of the two senators running for president voted for that FISA bill...I just wish I could remember whether it was McCain or Obama who contributed one of the 51 votes it needed to pass.
You're one fucking sick dude. Put me down for two.
Did anyone think of the movie "Heavyweights?"  I need to get me a blob.
i don't want constant state surveillance of anybody except *maybe* prisoners. privacy is a natural right.
Play COD4, get high, just the usual buddy stuff.
My favorite "Napster find" of all time was "Nirvana - Enter Sandman.mp3"
I know you mean "not equal", but the programmer in me cringes at that expression of it - *and the kid in me cringes at the anal retard that he's destined to become!*
Good judgment would suggest that. But McCain did not meet with her. And, it seems, they did not even bother to look up the newspapers from her town.
Reminds me of the Hell's Angels seal of approval on the Cheap Thrills album.
The internet is taking over.
&gt;offensive, petty, and juvenile  That pretty much sums up the catholic reaction to the whole thing, including this impeachment.
Well then, I won't suggest you read this: http://thinkprogress.org/2008/08/29/palin-mccain-kristol/  ...or this: http://www.nytimes.com/2008/08/04/opinion/04kristol.html  ...or this either: http://palinforvp.blogspot.com/2008/08/interesting-analysis-from-bill-kristol.html  ...and especially not this: http://www.weeklystandard.com/Content/Public/Articles/000/000/015/500wrhjq.asp
wearing what? Big bellies?   I swear to god that all you redditors must either be retarded or 12 years old. WTF?? What the flying fuck??? You can't see that girl is pregnant???
Putin "shucks it was nothing, in fact, if the tiger hadn't made to steal one of the film crews guns, noone would have had to have shot him, and everyone would have gone home safely tonight."
SHHHHHHHHHHHHH!!!  YOU CAN'T SAY THAT!!!
It's better that way ...
literal laughter? As opposed to metaphorical laughter?
If you're going to make fun of our accents (or indeed drinking), go right ahead, but do it accurately -- you know how sensitive we are :)   For future reference, Lloyd is a very non-Irish name and "mate" is antipodean or perhaps British, but not Irish.  Top o' the mornin to ya.
I hate to say this, but are you SURE you want your name on this list? I mean, do you REALLY want to tell this president you're a dissenter and give him your address?
Her point's not bad on the polar bears... Does putting them on the endangered species list stop global warming? If not what will? The Endangered species act is not the right avenue to address global warming.
Heaven of a drug, too.
How about this, we go with the facts. We have had 18 months to find out about Obama. Got anything he did wrong you want to talk about? We have had 3 days to talk about Palin? Want to bet that we won't find more?
Oif.  When can we stop pretending coverflow is useful for anything other than eye candy?
This ranks amongst the stupidest political articles I have ever read.
What? Are you speaking some sort of moon language?
I'm also largely satisfied with my N800's performance. Video playback just needs a little improvement, and web browsing would benefit from more RAM (and more CPU).  If this bigger tablet lives up to its promises, especially the $200 price, it'd be a awesome device, too. But I wouldn't hold my breath.
I was asking. It seems idiotic to me, and I don't understand it.
I read about some people who like sex with roadkill, because it's often still warm and sometimes even wriggling, what a treat!   This world.....I dunno.
And the Obama polls are always accurate, just like in the primaries.
Personally, no. But then again, we deserve the president we elect.
I for one would like to welcome our new milky overlords.
She looks like she's saying "John, I'm talking to you, stop daydreaming about Palin or the interview is over."
&gt; I thought you were done with me.  [citation needed]
Good point. The Daily Mail certainly wouldn't want to offend Hitler. 
You're thinking of ANOTHER scandal, the one with Monegan and Wooten.  Try to keep up! ;)
It could, but the user is unlikely to read that argument.
She is an anti-choice woman. That is why he picked her. It was pure pander, pure weakness. He wanted Lieberman, but was not willing to fight for him.
Americans consume a lot but they are also productive.  I'm pretty sure that my consumption is way below most of the people here complaining.  I know more than you about species interaction and I see that you are a complete idiot.  Pull your head out of your ass, buddy.
When did reddit adopt the YouYube commenters?  Is there some sort of idiot outreach program I'm not aware of?  Voted up to preserve the evidence of the complete lack of thought and logic the typical McCain supporter has.
&gt;I didn't mean to imply that your story did not happen. I meant that it was a rare act by crazy people that is so atypical that it should not be cited as a defining characteristic of a region.  I gave other examples in other respnonses to Whitey4Obama. Specifically several quick mentions of events that happened to me personally (Which were not racism, but bigotry). There were other "big deal" crimes as well while I lived down there, but the details of this one just stuck with me because it was so horific to read about.  &gt;I reject your claim that racism is somehow unique to the south...  Please show me where this claim is made.  &gt;...or that it is even more prevalent there.  My only comparisons are going to be various locations in the South (Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, etc) and various locations in the West (Arizona, California).   Out in the West  I've never heard someone say "Damn wetbacks" randomly in public. I'm sure it happens occasionally, but I've never experienced it.  When I lived in the South I heard "Damn niggers" (and wetbacks, jews, etc) more than my fair share. Some of these occurances were from complete strangers.  I tell you what, it's some experience when someone you've never met looks at you with one of those half angry, half smile annoyed expressions, says, "Fuckin' niggers, right!?" and then expects you to agree with them (Maybe even throw a little hate in that black person's way). How do you respond to that?  Based on my experiences, the South, or at least the rural South, is far more racist than other places I've been. Can I back that up with statistics, other data, or even life experience? Not beyond what I already have. I don't have experience in the North and far East other than my youth, where racism didn't even enter my mind, and whenever I've visisted people. Not really something to speak about.
In the recent past, 25% of our vice presidents ended up taking over the duties of the president (and I'm not even counting Cheney, who took over for Bush a long time ago).  Since McCain would be the oldest person ever elected to the presidency, do you really want to bet that Palin will not end up being the president?  The argument that McCain is a Cylon is a good one, but what makes you think that Palin isn't one too?
Do you work for The Onion?
If I'm morally opposed to them doing it to me, why would it be okay for me to do it to them?
You were done awhile ago, you just didn't realize it.  Guess you people need another school shooting or something to finish drilling the point how as you're JUST THAT DENSE!!   You can't show one instance where the weapons you *think* will protect your rights as an American have ever actually done that! Waco, Ruby Ridge, or any other politically deviant group who thought they could seek safety in firepower, ring any bells??  Okay, lets think here for a second, discharge say an AK-47 inside your home and lets say you miss ...do you have any idea where the round went? I bet your neighbor will. As opposed to discharging a handgun, odds are the round won't leave your house. It's not perfect but it's a lot safer.   Btw, yes you can take a deer with an M-4, M-16, and definitely with an AK-47. Hell, people have taken a deer with a 9mm....  Another strawman, I never said I hated guns, what I said was that military style weapons have no place in civilian hands. Btw, the UK and the US have entirely different societies, go there, you'll see for yourself. So you're comparing apples and oranges. 
I second that motion.
&gt; craft weapons from bones.
What?  The first sentence reads   &gt;BENGHAZI, Libya: Italy agreed over the weekend to pay Libya $5 billion as compensation for its 30-year occupation of the country, which ended in 1943.  That's great. That's how civilized nations should act. 
I'll be working.
I found the comic a bit odd and I'm not even sure it's that funny.  I just don't think there's enough truth in it to be funny.  I'm an English major and I'm not offended by the commentary but it just isn't funny.  And, just to clarify, I imagine that many of the most intelligent people that have ever lived were writers.  Just a guess. 
I also would like to have a system that forces users to read what I write. I doubt such a system exists, however.
Yeah, you don't have a soul.
It's my home state too, and anyone who thinks that the KKK has been remotely relevant there or anywhere else anytime in the last 20 years is deluded. The man clearly dislikes a long-dead hate group.  How edgy.  He might as well dislike Nazis and polio.
Perhaps the OP should define 'drugs' before expecting an upvote. Or at least add 'in public.'
Joel's Army sounds like a dangerous death cult.   Funny the government is cracking down hard on peaceful anti-war hippies, while letting these insane people build their own freakin *army*. Even more frightening is the possibility some of our leaders are connected to this cult....  
LOL... you mean you didn't read about the mountains of experience that Obama has? Funny thing is, when it was pointed out that Obama basically has no experience all republicans were labeled racist.  Based on that logic, we can only assume that democrats are all sexist!! Democrats... the hipocracy starts with them!!
&gt; Well, it's a lot closer than most states, and it isn't even connected to the real US by land.  Let's see, it's connected to Canada, which is connected to the contiguous 48 states... so it is in fact connected by land.
In a calculated move to get more voters the McCain/Palin campaign plans to sponsor a NASCAR car.
Actually, my husband has a great employer, (thank heavens).  Maybe insurance increases with salary.  My dad waited 4 months for a hip replacement in Southern Ontario, but both my mom and my daughter had cancer care (hospitalization, chemo, radiation, and surgery), within a day of being diagnosed, with no cost to our family, or increases in our insurance.  From everything that I've read that's not too common in the U.S., at least not for the treatment that my daughter had (8 years old, surgery, and then chemo for 8 months in-patient).  Not to mention 10 week premature triplets, chronic lung problems due to prematurity, and autism care for the last 10 years.  I consider us lucky, but since I've also paid into the system since I started working I don't feel badly that we took advantage of the health coverage when we needed it.   I'm sorry about your family- I'm 2nd generation Canadian-Dutch, and my entire paternal family was wiped out with the exception of my biological father, as well as my husband's maternal family (Azhkenazi Jews from Poland).  It's no fun for my kids to grow up with few extended relatives either.   I'm glad that you're happy with your country- I wish you all the best.  
Or you know you could actually find it...  http://www.flickr.com/photos/23140504@N02/2814690091/sizes/o/
yah, actually i switched to natural american spirits, and w/out the extra 600 chemicals added, they are far less addictive. I figure if i smoke a few cartons, it will make it easier to quit. Going back to a regular cigarette tastes like crack now.  So when i quit, i wanna start running again.
Mmmmmmmm.  Kool-Aid.
I understand what you are saying, and I agree that politicians should be completely open about everything in their lives. But when it comes to private family issues, it should be the person's choice whether they want to make it public knowledge. I'm more interested in the issues though, and I wish that the media would be more concerned about their brains than their dicks.
&gt; The vast majority of us are just having fun looking at all the evidence that supports the **hypothesis**.  FTFY
And this, friends, is why Multiculturalism ultimately is bullshit.  Discrimination is a violation of an individual's rights as a human being, not a group's rights as Muslims, or African-Americans, or Quebecois. Protect individual rights better and you don't need "group rights".  Keep this in mind the next time a "legitimate" social commentator forgets that two wrongs don't make a right. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Houston_A._Baker#2006_Duke_University_lacrosse_team_scandal
Love the reference. Underrated movie.
Explain please.
That's all the American public needs, another running mate who can't lie for shit.
Yep.  I think that is one thing the Bush Administration failed to concider at length.  The culture of the Middle East is a lot different than the German or Japanese cultures, the reaction to a forceful change of national policy is very different.
I literally shit myself
No it isn't foolish.  Artificially, propping up one city means denying money for other cities...cities that would support people at lower cost.  It also denies the formation or newer cities in safer areas.  We don't have infinite resources and money.
There's only one way to know for sure...
Blah blah blah go to your freedom speech zone peon.
The video suggests there are two options, either there is no god, or the Bible is right.  This is known as a false dilemma, e.g. either you vote Republican or you want the terrorists to win.  That is why I have constantly called it poorly thought out and immature. I don't see how one can look at that video and say it is neither pro-god nor anti-god, what most people refer to as "agnostic."  It clearly and indisputably comes across anti-god, what most people call "atheism."
Intriguing woman - any pictures?
Man, Billy and Mandy must be pissed for Grim not taking them with.
ssh david@posh ;)
Failsafe refers to what you do after you detect that the program has failed. The assert is what checks to see if the program failed. You cannot have a failsafe system without assertion checking.
pic or it didn't happen
&gt; be sure to preface each story with "This is a myth"  Before they could call it a myth they would have to prove it is a myth.  And they can't.  Nor can you.
Porn star farm.
Obama: Two for flinching!
Spore faced more resistance from Maxis than it from EA.
&gt; The whole "more fluid!" thing is just a clever Starbucks marketing schtick for people who want a Big-Gulp of caffeinated warm milk, not real coffee drinkers.  Should be obvious. Starbucks is a milkshake franchise, not a coffee house.   Also nobody uses these words for Coffee sizes in Milan or Paris.
I just voted you a up a bunch of times, but I have to vote this one down, for using "coke-laced weed". Cocaine HCl cannot be smoked for a high.
Die.
Does it?  How?
So, what do Yes and No mean, smart guy?  Not a fucking thing, by themselves.
Maybe because its rumor and people fought hard to get rid of 9/11 truthers and now it seems they have found a new conspiracy to rally around and pisses of certain redditors.  Might as well go ahead and change the reddit alien to make him appear pregnant.  
Although he does think it is appropriate to use the shattered lives and property destruction as a prop for his acceptance speech.  If McCain were any more of a tool he'd have "Craftsman" tattooed on his forehead.
I was like, redneck, that's just awesome. We used to do that at my church camp in Texas....shit.
*Electronically* voted in.  And one time it was Supreme Court appointment.
You aren't fully informed is all.  Knocking a zombie's head off with a baseball bat is a also perfectly cromulent way to kill him, so there must be something useful in there.
That's less interesting than the Internet would have led me to believe such a pairing would be.
| 1940, July: U.S. imposes trade sanctions, followed by an embargo, aimed at curbing Japan's military aggression in Asia.   Maybe sanctions arent always a good thing.
The entire time I was waiting for a downpour out of nowhere.  How disappointing :/
Less embarrassing than telling someone you pissed your pants?  Pregnancy can really push on a bladder.
In Soviet Russia... he is.
Didn't you read the other article? She's into hunting bears and wolves, not tigers.
I think the assumption is that if you care about security, you've already migrated from windows.  /me ducks, dodges, and gets smacked in the face with a downmod anyway
1) I'm sure you would.  I *do* know about astrology though. And you are quite right, I'm not trying to prove astrology wrong. Thats not what the video is about.  2) Indeed, anything *could* be a menace to society. We as a society have to judge a concept on it benefits compared to it's flaws. The whole point of the video isn't to disprove Astrology (for redditors I assume I don't need to) but to make people reasses the threat of astrology. Most people here (I assume) think astrology is nonsense  but also think it's harmless. This video was to encourage people to think again about that, and hopefully investigate further.   3) I like this idea that the bits of astrology that work are well hidden and need a lot of research to find. Research you assume I haven't done. There is no respectable study, no work that suggests astrology is better than Barnum statments.   But again that wasn't the point of the video, the only argument I made to disprove Astrology was to compare it to contained flying mammals. 
Yep. That about sums it up. Later she'll be out spending all of his money and he'll be fucking skanks at the bar.
your neighbors nubile and just recently 18 year old daughter trying on new bra's in her 2nd story window....
Not the best this week.
http://www.reddit.com/r/PalinProblem/
She's a doe caught in the headlights, plucked out of obscurity by a clueless senile politician. If she's lucky three months from now her name will be nothing more than a trivia question, if she's unlucky it will be a punchline.
Those words would annoy an Italian major, who doesn't like Starbucks' fake words.   An English major would know that small, medium and large were proper descriptions.
Please explain how this qualifies as "spam".
Cry me a river.  This is par for the course for humanity.  In fact, total vaporization of most of the targets might by a record high for humanitarian effort given the circumstances.  Show me a war/battle done more humanely.
So go to the [Red Cross site.](http://www.redcross.org/)
I'd say 90%+ of people don't truly question anything.
If she (the daughter) were pregnant in that photo, she would not be carrying that baby in front like that... that much weight pressing against her pregnant belly would be very uncomfortable. But a fascinating photo nonetheless, where did you find it? It looks like it was taken backstage just before or after her acceptance speech this week. EDIT: in light of recent new facts, I humbly stand corrected.
Maybe, maybe not.  But I'm far more comfortable with someone in the economy spotting that the polar bears are fulfilling a valuable role and taking the opportunity to ensure that value is provided to humanity by turning it into a business, than some idiot politician collectivising resources for dubious intelligence and motives.
As opposed to any other response which could be seen as equivalent to laughing at the selection (e.g., deadpan sarcastic remarks), *other* than literally laughing at it.  
Then it must be taught, like the invisible dinosaur I keep in my closet.
Hmmmm who ran this first, this guy or dailykos? 
Check out heavens-above.com for star charts - it's free to register and allows you to input your exact location for precise information.  Your scope is a good size for looking at Mars and Saturn with a good eyepiece - you'll also be able to start looking at Messier Objects - galaxies that were the most prominent (and 1st to be recognized in early Astronomy) Go out and grab a good book (try David Levy's Guide to the Night Sky - it's usually about $25 or so).
I'm pro-choice. I don't believe a fetus is worth protecting, however, many people do and because stem cell research is not necessary to facilitate America's future it is both immoral and criminal to use their money in a manner they find morally abhorrent.
There's a big difference between chewing a coca leaf and snorting something that is derived using ammonia and gasoline...although isn't that how splenda is made too?  [Making cocaine](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mz5jnwItGmQ&amp;feature=related)  edit to add video
You're new to this planet, aren't you?
going? he always has been.
Users have things to do. Forcing unnecessary effort on their part makes our apps an obstacle to accomplishing those things.
You begin to cut him up, then notice that his bones have dissolved into a white liquid. You make a note to try to get out as fast as possible.
I think Politics has become Obama's private Fox lately. 
Anything Feynman on this site gets an upvote from me.
It wasn't fair, though. I mean, who ever expects to be hit *back?*
So then an atheist is someone who KNOWS that human beings are the most powerful beings in the universe. I don't understand how someone KNOW that.
1. you have no idea what people vote up or down  2. you especially have no idea if people vote science stories down in particular  3. Who's a little confused? I mean other than you?
Have you tried killing a hooker?
After reading that, I'm wondering if the techniques of the Old Masters have been rediscovered since.
If cocaine was available in tablets, lots of people would just grind up their tablets and shoot them.  They're not injecting it because they have no other way of taking it, they're injecting it because that's what produces the best high.
I was about to add religious, but realised it'd be redundant. :)
No, this is all propaganda to make him look good, as he was out there to study the cats, it wouldn't look very good to shoot one with a bullet.  The claim was that he came to the scene, witnessed a wild animal charging, then fired the the tranquilizer dart before it could attack anyone.  Complete bullshit of course, as not tranquilizer will slow down or change the mind of a large wild animal that quickly. I doubt it would have been harmed, according to this account, since it was simply measured, tagged, and released.
&gt;(I really don't want to argue that - it's water over the bridge)  Over the dam, maybe.  &gt;do you mean to say that the right wingers are now being hypocritical  No, you know what I mean to say, and it's not about the right, but the left that I speak regarding hypocrisy.  But I'll acknowledge that you're point is a valid one.  Hypocrisy is central to politics of any persuasion, unless you can be really Taoist about things, and it seems that nobody is.  &gt;What's your opinion of Todd Palin being given access to information (the emails), which his wife in her official capacity refused to give to the people of Alaska, that the she claims is covered by executive privledge?  Oh, my! I'm shocked! Appalled! I'm as indignant as a Yeti on his 3rd Bitburger can possibly be.  Only Obama can save us now, with the help of his trusty sidekick and mentor, Joe... 
It definitely **is** nauseating. What kind of person sees ads these days?!
Why would four people (so far) who subscribed to the Marijuana subreddit want to downmod this?
Opiates are pretty rough. Tend to hook you before you know it.  I know firsthand, and kicking is not so much fun. But they are fun if you can use them sparingly and not every day.  My friend ate a Phentonel patch Christmas Eve and died.  Don't eat Phentonel patches. I put one on my arm once and was high as fuck for three days.  That said, I don't mess with opiates much anymore.  Oh, and Dilaudids are really fucking strong and dissolve completely in water.
Why/how is this redneck?
I am on Reddit in the car too. I use the Blackberry data connection to read the latest. Reddit is The Internet version of crack cocaine. 
Maybe you should douche. 
No, he's not, you freaking idiot.  He himself has stated that there's no concrete proof for either side.  Wouldn't a creationist put forth the bible as proof for his beliefs?
Bush had executive experience going in. How did that work out?  My point was not about her experience anyway, I quote myself as evidence: "I've been saying it's not so much her inexperience as her lack of wisdom, but now I'll have to add lack of knowledge to that."
Fixed: "The numbers on the price tag were too high, so I just rubbed one out."
Last I checked, their super collector game actually had crippled network play, so a lot of people couldn't even do lan parties with it.
MS not copy Apple?  Why mess with tradition?
This is the very model of Russian totalitarian propaganda.  No wonder it's got 91 points on reddit.
Going to the gym never helped make me richer. Even Arnold realized that after 50-some years. 
In Russia, president assasinate YOU
I met Randi once and got to have dinner with him along with 4-5 people from my local magic store.  I still feel bad about how many of the restaurant's spoons we destroyed that night.
I can verify that picture. It came from my photoshops.
Are you sure that isn't amniotic fluid?
Let's stop thinking critically as well. Oh I see you've already started. (hint: stem cell research is not comparable to any of those things you listed. Strawmen are wonderful though, aren't they?)
Well, he could always sine a derivative loan...
The ongoing profitability of the perfume industry refutes your entire argument.
I don't like the taste of those. The chemical additives of Marlboro must be what makes them taste good. Are the Natural America Spirits smokes relatively cheap or are they pretty expensive?
What... the fuck?
Seriously? The only thing you find in an animated reenactment of a nuclear bomb killing hundreds of thousands of human beings and there suffering is a means to type in a online meme?  Where is your fucking humanity.
you can always use static typing to prove that it won't happen at runtime. that function should take list of (key,value) pairs and there won't be any problem. if it must be variadic then it still can be proven statically but it requires quite powerful type system (like haskell with some extensions)
I always get a 404 error when I try to login to comment. Must be because I wasn't going to the "M." site. Thanks for the info.
Just in case you're like me and don't follow religion: this has nothing to do with the TV preacher Joel Osteen (as I originally thought). It is a reference to the book of Joel from the Bible. More about the origin of the name here http://www.discernment-ministries.org/JoelsArmy1.htm   To sum it up: The “Day of the Lord” as seen through the eyes of the New Wave “prophets” will be a time when Joel’s Army, led by these “prophets,” will pour out God's wrath on the church! Then, they claim, for the first time in two thousand years the “pure church” will come forth. In other words: fundamentalist whackos. I find this amazingly hypocritical. The Christians are going on and on about the fundamentalist Muslim whackos but they are 1000 times worse. Yay Armageddon!
That's nearly meaningless. He's been up by an average of three points over the last couple of months.  This just means McCains VP pick is doing exactly what it's supposed to do, stunt Obama's Convention bounce.  
Yes, but in a discussion most people use conscription to mean mandatory service no matter what(Israel) and a draft is used as the term of emergency conscription, meaning not required in times of peace. Considering we were discussing both(and using the terms in that way) they are not interchangeable.
The only thing I see in support of the gnome is that discard is ambiguous. If you had saved once before making the file dirty again, an option of discard might lead you to wonder if it would discard/delete the document entirely. Not that most computer users would ever think that, but that's the only reason I can see why it would be different. I've seen some really dumb bug reports on launchpad to justify gnome being extremely verbose. 
Ew.
yours is even odder :P
A friend of mine who's doing research in telecommunications for the University told me that he heard a talk in a convention he went to which mentioned that bluetooth headsets actually transmit **more** power than the mobile phone. This is for Bluetooth 1 and 2, he told me that Bluetooth 3 has significantly lower power but is not yet supported in any device.   EDIT: Wait, not more, but it was comparable, if less.
agreed!  
After a summer spent mostly taking a miserable chem class and waiting for my friends to get back from vacations, I decided to go the mall (something I rarely do). And instead of shopping, I turn to listening to music and exercising by covering the entire mall multiple times. I sit down in the center atrium for a breather thinking about how awkward I feel, since crowds in malls make me nervous sometimes. And then out of the blue, a cute black girl walks up and tells me that I'm very cute, blushes and spins around to head to what I thought were her friends. I almost forgot about this indicent, but RayWest's comment reminded me of it.  Also, loving this thread very much! Let's keep it going!
Doubtful. Don't mistake me, I'm no supporter, but I sense that while she is many things, I don't believe she's a quitter, and if the GOP thinks they can offer her the job and then force her out, I imagine they may have a surprise in store.
*[Have agreed as follows:](http://www.iaea.org/Publications/Documents/Infcircs/Others/infcirc140.pdf)* *Each of the Parties to the Treaty undertakes to pursue negotiations in good faith on effective  measures relating to cessation of the nuclear arms race **at an early date** and to nuclear  disarmament, and on a treaty on general and complete disarmament under strict and effective  international control.* *IN WITNESS WHEREOF the undersigned, duly authorised, have signed this Treaty.* *DONE in triplicate, at the cities of London, Moscow and Washington, the first day of July,  one thousand nine hundred and sixty-eight.* 
**If true, this is a totally unethical "partnership" between the Red Cross and a highly-partisan political event, and would violate the rules of their tax exempt status.**  **Red Cross line to report Ethical issues: 1-888-309-9679**
ohhhh, if that's the american dream, then i gotta find me some mobster friends -&gt; screw engineering, working hard and being honest
The simplest explanation I ever heard of this (from a rather ancient statistics professor) was, "Why is my life expectancy larger than yours? Because I've lived through dangers you haven't yet!"  In fact, a more useful statistic is life expectancy at a certain age, to counterract this effect. There seems to be a hard limit at about 125-130 for how long a human can possibly live for, but up to that, life expectancy is one-way as age goes up.
Sounds like those TV preachers y'all got over in the US of A. Innit. 
You're really stretching, dude.  Black is the absence of any white.  That does not mean, however, that grey does not exist.  Similarly, if atheism is the polar opposite of theism, that does not mean that everybody is one or the other.  One can either believe in god, not believe in god, or be unsure.  The question of whether or not god exists is profound and deep and enjoyable to examine from all angles.  Bickering over semantics however is a trite and worthless pursuit.   You give me three terms to use, one for someone who believes in god, one for someone who believes in no god, and one for someone who is on the fence.  I'll agree to use your terms and we can move on with the discussion.  It is the concept that these terms represent that is interesting to me, not what arbitrary combinations of letters we use to represent them.
upmodded for the (good) ontological rant that is the last paragraph
Yes, you "learned from your mistakes". I'm told Europeans have been known to begin this magical process even earlier than 18.
What the hell does Nazi ideology have to do with what I said? Moreover, why the hell does every single internet argument seem to end up with someone calling someone else a Nazi? So strange.  Anyway:  I only said that doing good is more important than wanting to do good for the sake of it. If I get a kinky sexual thrill from giving alms to the poor or volunteering at my local burns clinic, so long as I do just as much good as someone who does it purely because they want to help people, it really does not matter.  Now fuck off and learn not to dogmatically fall back on idiotic and reactionary name calling. 
It's just annoying to have to pay the price of a brand new game for a shit ton of old games, especially if you only want one. If you want all of them, well, I guess you're in luck.
...and high schoole principals disagree.  Lowering the drinking age may change the face of the college campus, but it will also change the high school campus by allowing Seniors to buy for their underclassmen friends.  I'm not saying this doesn't happen now, I'm just saying that this is the biggest obstacle against lowering the drinking age.
Genuinely made me laugh out loud at various points, bloody brilliant is the Onion.
Please tell me you were being sarcastic.
"Never attribute to malice that which can be adequately explained by stupidity." - Hanlon's Razor
Bienvenidos al reddit de Argentina! Aunque fue creado más que nada como una prueba (o un juego), veo que apenas 5 días después de su creación ya tiene algunos suscriptores! Por favor, dejen sus comentarios contando de donde son, y qué tipo de artículos les gustaría ver linkeados en argentina.reddit.com. 
Violence != Terrorism.
Yes, but Palin is an assault rifle wielding expedient whore who probably sprays and prays, while Putin is a seasoned rifleman who respects the tiger, because he is the tiger, and shoots with well placed grace. 
For some people, getting laid is not difficult. For the rest of us, there's porn.
I stopped going to coffee shops when they started renaming everything to be something like 'Chocolate Candy Mocha Frappe Liquid Sunshine Blast'. I just can't bring myself to utter the names out loud. 
This seems somehow familiar.
Wat?
upvoted for teaching me a new word (galdiator)
That would require creativity. Neural nets and euristic systems only recognise patterns. They do not make new ones.  That is, for now!
a laundry list of items, including fire bombs, Molotov cocktails, **brake fluid, photographs and maps of St. Paul, paint, computers and camera equipment, and documents and other communications**   because normal, everyday people will never have any use for these items
If this is the best that we can do against her we are fucked.
Whatever happened to Captain Obvious?
"The first blog to do so"
&gt; it neglects to note that she was for it before she was against it.  Worse than that: under her, Alaska's state government declined to return the federal money for the Bridge to Nowhere---"thanks but no thanks, and we'll keep the money".
Then you must feel we should annex Florida for being hit and having more *hurricane money* sent to their state than Louisiana has ever had. Also, California for their unsafe practice if building some of the largest cities in the country right on top of fault lines, along with their tendency to catch fire every year or two. Right?
I just got back from a family reunion... they LOVE Palin.  Apparently Fox News (which they all hold up as the ONLY objective news source that tells BOTH sides) has really been talking her up.  They are superiorly impressed that she is pro-life and not afraid to loudly be so.  They find it admirable that she (supposedly) carried a down syndrome baby to full term.  Yes, I wanted to tear out my skin and rampage through the picnic as a thrashing skinless zombie.
Fuck their sports games. Madden might be fun, but for 60 bucks they should add a little more than "roster updates", "the game adapts to you", and "ALL NEW Madden Cards!!!!11".  EA and Activision are the reasons I'm starting to get into games that are more indy or more original. Now that the video game industry is so huge, the game companies are starting to make games that find the sweet spot between effort and profit. That point on the graph often causes games to be really shitty, but hey, at least they get to maximize their profit and make more increasingly shitty games in the future!!!
She hunts moose.
&gt;&gt;You must admit that the list of exceptions is pretty long.  &gt;Compared to the amount of software available for Windows, it's not.  That's funny, because I just loaded the first two Windows apps that came to mind (Notepad and Word), typed something, and told them both I wanted to quit.  Notepad: Save/Don't save/Cancel  Word: Yes/No/Cancel
Nuance:  Reddit lacks it.
I'm pretty sure 7ft 12 is 8 feet.
So you're not necessarily against preserving the ecosystem, you're just suspicious of the motives of some promoting its preservation?
Equally correct, though the 'theist' bit I think means 'belief' not 'god'. Anyway, as I said, it is a definitional gray area.  What is the word for someone who positively belives there not to be a god then?
The authors suffers from the NIH syndrome.
Raw bacon is never as delicious looking as cooked bacon. He needs to be put in a man sized skillet.
I'm not an OS X developer, so I have a question. When you say that the convention is for "the safest, or most logical option" to be on the right, which is it? The safest, or the most logical? Or did you mean the "safest AND most logical."  Personally, I am not an idiot and I do not make a lot of keystroke mistakes. If I hit Command-Q to quit and I get some annoying dialog, I just want to be able to hit Enter to do what I wanted to do. I don't want to have to use the mouse, read anything or make any decisions. A pre-highlighted "OK" button makes me happy! 1% of the time, when I do make a mistake, *then* I can move the mouse and click the other button.  In other words I want "the most logical" but definitely not "the safest" to be the default.  Somebody else might have a different preference, maybe they make lots of mistakes.  But in that case, the thing to do would be to ask "why are our testers making so many mistakes with this action" and discover things like the buttons are too small and close together, the icons look too much alike, the French words for "close" and "format" are too similar, Save shouldn't be right next to Quit, or some other UI insight.  In other words, reliance on an "are you sure?" dialog box should be seen as the design failure.  Software should be smarter than it is in this respect, it's no better than it was in 1985. If I open a file in Photoshop, rotate it 90 degrees one way, then 90 degrees the other way, then I haven't changed it. (Or type something in Word and then type it back.) So why does Photoshop interrupt me to ask me if I'm sure I want to close without "saving my changes"? Best case this costs me 2 seconds, but if I've had the doc open in a window for a week, it might cost me a lot of time while I try to figure out what changes I made. /rant
Is there anything the Dear Leader *can't* do?
Why?
Misunderestimated was an intentional "Bushism". In order to convey the seriousness with which Palin, and her most fervent followers need to be taken.
You do realize that the technology of the time isn't what we have to day - collateral damage in bombing couldn't be avoided even using conventional munitions.  Yes it was a horrible event, but that event saved far more lives than it cost on both sides by preventing a D-Day type of invasion in Japan.
lets hope not, women who don't want other women to control their own bodies is hardly 'feminist'.
Kids cannot tell that creationism is rubbish. They are kids. Only when they grow up will the ones that think for themselves be able to figure it out, and in the meantime they will be pretty confused by the whole issue and unable to make up their mind for while as they do not have any understanding of the world around them. Just because something represents a different point of view does not automatically make eligible for teaching it in schools. There are many idiots out there with different ideas. Schools should be teaching facts, and that's how kids can then better understand what is going on around them.  And if you support feeding crap like creationism down some wide-eyed kids throat then you are guilty of child abuse. You’d rather hide behind the "let people make up their own minds" platitudes and let kids minds be raped with the moronic teachings that you support.   &gt; all you want is people to believe exactly as you do Rubbish. Never said that.   &gt; real life works nothing like that. Your life. I’m lucky enough to be able to send my kids to a top notch school and shield them from being affected by influence of idiots like you.
*zing*
I wrote a column about this in January called, "I want to live in a surveillance society." http://computerworld.com/action/article.do?command=viewArticleBasic&amp;articleId=9055126
Not a non-sequitur? Your conclusion does not follow your premise while failing in your attempt to make an irrelevant point. Approximately 1% of Democrats voted for Biden's candidacy when given a choice. 99% voted for someone else. Clinton received more votes than Obama but she is nowhere to be found on the ticket.  As to your closing pointless remark, it only makes you look like a self-righteous blowhard. I expect you hear that a lot.
Executive experience does trump legislative experience.
The American Eagle... wait fuck... how did this happen?  An Eagle against a fucking Bear and a god dam DRAGON!  That isn't fucking fair... it better be a god dam MAGIC eagle that shots laser beams from it's god dam eyes and shits nuclear warheads.
&gt; Who's spending all day with those kids?  Their father does.
Hiding the birth of her daughter's baby speaks volumes about the type of leader she will be.  This takes us back to the policies of the 1940's and 1950's.  Do we want to go back to back-alley abortions and restricting care for pregnant women and pulling bullshit like THIS to avoid facing the real issue: teenagers have sex, more so if they are raised on 'abstinance only' teachings, and they are less likely to use contraception and more likely to get pregnant.  This woman needs to be exposed for the type of leader she will be, not the type of leader she says she'll be.  Look at the list, one of these kids is probably Trig under his real name.  The press should look up all these kids.  
Seems to me that the spy business is a dangerous one even in good times. Also seems to me that the last thing a spy organization would do is call back its spies because of a potential conflict. Logic and reason dictate that you would want to have assets working harder to get information which might be even more useful and easier to obtain if a conflict were to begin. Of course, with me not being in the intelligence business, wtfdik
I assume that reddit is made up of two general types in this matter: those that already are as polite as I could wish, and those who wouldn't change their behavior whatever I said. 
Whats with eating the asshole? Why would you do that? thats fucking disgusting.
&gt;"thanks but no thanks, and we'll keep the money"  LOL...great way to describe it!
oh my!
Thanks!  It's actually not particularly close to a Home Depot...  I drive past that exit all the time. Here's another shot from Bird's Eye view: http://maps.live.com/default.aspx?v=2&amp;FORM=LMLTCC&amp;cp=pkjky47rt94f&amp;style=b&amp;lvl=2&amp;tilt=-90&amp;dir=0&amp;alt=-1000&amp;scene=10137524&amp;phx=0&amp;phy=0&amp;phscl=1&amp;ss=yp.home%20depot~pg.1~sst.0&amp;encType=1
Nothing on that magnitude happened in the lower 48 US states.
In MD they're 5 or 6 bucks a pack, i get em online for 46$ a carton, so they're not cheaper, really. but i did go to their website and got a coupon mailed to me for a free carton, or 20 bucks off, i haven't opened it, i forget.  and i agree about the taste, but your body will thank you.
Great. Now I'm hungry again.
The only strip I like anymore that is in papers is Get Fuzzy.
You know who I pray to? Joe Pesci. Two reasons; first of all, I think he's a good actor. Okay. To me, that counts. Second; he looks like a guy who can get things done. Joe Pesci doesn't fuck around. Doesn't fuck around. In fact, Joe Pesci came through on a couple of things that God was having trouble with. For years I asked God to do something about my noisy neighbor with the barking dog. Joe Pesci straightened that cock-sucker out with one visit.
this is dumb.
oof. This article was really painful to read.
Download Red Alert from Westwood free today.   Download FreeRA, and open source implementation of the engine for Linux.  Add the data (.mix) files from the original Westwood Red Alert 1 game.  Then play!
Maybe military aggression in Asia isn't always a good thing. 
Waiting for Blackwater to bust in and arrest them.
It receives a significant amount of public funding which is what I am referring too. 
They did pretty much the same to Germany in the last weeks of the war. Massive killings of civilians led by people who are heroes now.
I don't mean to incite a language war, but I think it really depends upon the culture of the language being used as well as the quality/availability of libraries in that language.  For instance, the availability of and culture surrounding Python modules is quite different from that of ASP.NET.
There are actually two pins. What you listed is one of them, but the hardest one to hide would be the low-key quickie marriage. That would have to create public records - and as teenagers, there might very well be an online presence to trace (blogs, myspace, facebook, etc.)  As far as the flight is concerned, it was published, and at least minimally backchecked by the local papers. Whether it's true or not, it only leads to one conclusion about her judgment: that it's marginal. The question is whether she's judgment impaired w/r/t what she tells the media or impaired w/r/t sane medical/personal choices. 
well actually, I am not a big fan of Anime, but I would not be surprised if what you state is true.  Yet I more am talking about like American movie's or something along the line of a Saving Private Ryan or Pearl Harbor, but with the Atomic Bomb. 
How paeple get indoctrinated?
But if you stick with it you'll gland a great deal.
All polling now for about the next two weeks is essentially pointless from convention bounces. 
mcsame as Bush, true.
Putin makes Chuck Norris look like that "Leave Brittney alone" guy.
I noticed that...why wasn't he challenged on it?
Can I dodge that question by saying it's not related to any of the hard sciences that I should have focused on? And since most of you are grad students, tell me, was it Plato who said this?:  "What is happening to our young people? They disrespect their elders; they disobey their parents; they ignore the law; they riot in the streets inflamed with wild notions. Their morals are decaying. What is to become of them?"   I just want to say: Carry on young people.
Omnipresent, in their words.
Yep, you can't get much more terrific than that.
I can't tell if you're intentionally being ironic or not.
wow, tangent.
whats the date on this?
Modesto sounds like a weird name for a super villain. He will destroy the world but it was nothing really.
But if that is not terrorism, then what else is?  We're all terrorists or are alive and live the lives we do because of terrorism. We owe everything we have to terrorism. And now we are hypocritical enough to wage a war on it? Ridiculous.
The sun. Directly. For hours.
The truth hurts doesn't it.
Next on Fox News: Warhammer Online - A sodomy simulator being sold to your children!
See my other post where I repeat this, but the actual statement the video is making is:  &gt; The video suggests there are two options, either there is no &gt;**G**&lt;od, or the Bible is right It is specifically addressing the christian God (the capitalized G refers to him and him alone).  So it *would* be correct to say that either the Bible is right or there is no **G**od.  It is not making any statement regarding Allah, or Zeus or any others...just God.
Can I get an autograph Stevie Nicks?
In future, please be more specific WHICH lie. Thank you.
How awesome would it be to raise the draw-bridge when the Jehovah's Witnesses came knocking?
There are very few stories here that make me feel *extremely fucking angry and disgusted*. This is one of them.
.&gt; ↑ ↑ ↓ ↓ ← → ← → B A
Don't be too excited for RA3. I have played the beta and the only thing going for it is the graphics - even the graphics aren't as good as the gameplay trailers that they show.
I couldn't agree more. That is probably why they were/are so successful. You must understand though that many of these religious texts were not original, and copied much from their time but they were the most effective forms for change, so in that sense they are more important than the original. There are a lot of beautiful stories, passages, verses to learn from in many if not the the majority of religious texts. But I think we should look at them in a secular way, and detach all the god, other nonsensical concepts, and moral values that have not dated as well as love your neighbour.
This is embarrasing.
a person who just doesn't believe, is a person that thinks they have enough evidence to prove that god does not exist.  And no, I wouldn't.  As I said before, atheist are no better than the fundies.  Now if they were willing to admit they just didn't know, that's a another story.  I myself am agnostic. Would I vote for someone who is agnostic?  Of course I would.
"And one other thing: Although the article states that Palin "canceled Stevens’ much-maligned 'bridge to nowhere',” it neglects to note that she was for it before she was against it."   hmmmm...reminds of another group of politicians who voted FOR something then later changed their minds and are now AGAINST it.  Any guesses?
There's your McCain VP pick right there. He's got executive _and_ foreign policy experience out the wazoo, he's in favor of torture, he's got more guns than Sarah Palin, plus he's the only candidate in the world who can compete with Obama in the shirtless physique category.
Great piece.   What you wrote about normalizing surveillance in the other direction is spot on. 
Nope.  Some of them are groundless.
I love how everyone conveniently uses God for "their will".
Ahhhh, welcome back CCCP :(
Instead of "Don't save, Cancel, Save", they should make it "Grrr, Hmph, Hooray!"
He stopped posting.
I like your mad stalking skills.
The fact she is a hot babe doesn't hurt.
That wasn't a downmod.
as long as you brought the lube and meth I suspect he might just be game.  Or just the meth.  Or just the lube, for that matter.
The National Day of Prayer Car would be perfect (and it's FUCKING REAL!):  http://www.ndptf.org/press_room/Index.cfm?Entity=4&amp;Department=4&amp;Dept_Order=1&amp;This_TopicOrder=1&amp;This_SubtopicOrder=6
You know what else isn't funny? Not getting your venti Latte on time and being late for work. There's a line back here, jackass.
I'm confused. How can you tell?? Is it because she is still willing to fuck him after seeing his small dick?
And the Democrats are just as bad. It's all a giant game. You're a part of this game whether you know it or not. Go search Google for "Problem-Reaction-Solution". It is how the people in power keep us busy and under control. No matter who you vote for in the 2 party system you're fucked. Open your eyes and quit being so naïve!
I am an expert on race relations because I live next to black people.
I shit you not: It works very well when mixed with weed.  I'm not sure if the weed burning around it helps it to combust but not vaporize, or if the stuff I got was freebase or what, but it definitely worked.
Why all the bells and whistles? Cheney did the same for a friend, didn't he? Or was it all the way around? I just cant seem to remember...
If you hold down the shift button, "fail" should turn into "EPIC Fail".
The iPhone thing seems like such a band-aid. Maybe it works well enough, but it seems so dirty.  Maybe instead they should just make it harder for users to accidentally destroy things? Or have an undo (or Trash can, or "deleted" bit somewhere).  I think it is a bad idea to interrupt users, and a bad idea to scare them with scary red buttons. It's like the first times I used Vista, and it was constantly unsettling me with "Are you sure you really want to let this untrusted application use TCP?"
What's to explain? Isn't it obvious?
It was AOL Time Warner, but they changed it back to time warner a year or two ago.
I think it's the other way around. You know that smoking is harmful, so an increase in harmf caused will be a small percentage. By contrast, an increase of the harmful effects of jam will be a millionfold increase.
*...has a Vagina of +5 Child-Rearing...*  I'll have to remember that one.
MUAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA
The two nuttiest people i know grew up under the power lines.  One's older brother died of Leukemia... just sayin'   Read the book "Ohms" for an eye opener. 
nor is it 'feminist' to run with a candidate who opposed a bill guaranteeing equal pay for equal work (because it might lead to more lawsuits--horrors).  She's an insult to feminists.
Oh. :-[
&gt;Tired of going through a ton of steps to convert your aac files to mp3, or how about those annoying WMA files that are still kicking around on your machine from your Windows days? AudialHub lets you do it quick and clean. Here’s how: Download them from Soulseek or re-rip them from the CD so you're not making a third generation, horrible-sounding copy of something. Wait, what am I saying? This is on Macgasm. Mac users can't hear the difference between shit. Carry on.
Except for Steve. He's cool with Steve.
http://www.reddit.com/r/obvious/
Everything's still moving too fast!
I'm sorry, the correct answer is "They need to do way instain mother&gt;"
Can I use all my firefox extensions with the 810? Can it run firefox? The youtube videos Ive seen show a GUI of stylus driven window dragging. Could they have made it more awkward? I really wanted the 810 when it came out, the hardware looks great, but the OS just seems half-assed. But again I haven't  used it. 
If anything, this is a case for the baby being her's and not her daughter's.  If her daughter was in labor in Alaska, she could have just kept quiet until after her speech, not made these outlandish medical claims, and just flown back to Alaska without saying anything.  She would "disappear" for a couple days and suddenly you have your newborn baby.
As will The Pirate Bay.
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
I've noticed that since I've been spending so much time online my attention span has drastically diminished. My brain is swimming with the information I have absorbed as I try to sort out what is valid and what is garbage; and I cannot seem to focus on mundane tasks for more than a few minutes.  In the meantime, my emails and phone calls go unanswered, my house and business are disorganized and life is passing me by.  I've been doing better about staying away, and actually got a lot done this weekend. The key (I'm finding) is to imagine the future and evaluate how much impact today's internet surfing will really have in the grand scheme of things. Life is short.
I hope you'll explain how running a state owned business with state backing that competes directly with private companies that did a better job at a profit is either conservative or Republican, unless those now mean cronyism.  
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
That point you demonstrated has no relevance on piracy or the potential harm. So it does fail.   The only people that piracy is harmful to are the companies who wish to seek to profit from preventing new technology from cutting in on their monopoly. The market has shown that the system of distribution that was previously used simply will not cut it in the information age - it is up to them to adapt or die. There is no harm in positive evolution for the rest of us.   Illegality isnt even debatable of course it is illegal in America. However this has no bearing on the potential harm or morality. Piracy as it stands now is an act of civil disobedience. Legality has nothing to do with law and the best example is racism is America. Just because legally sanctioned racism was law did not make it legal and the correct action was to bypass the law through an act of civil disobedience. 
&gt; I just wonder if it's too late for most people to give a $#@! anymore.  Of the 6.5 billion people in the world, 6.5 billion of them aren't currently programmers.  (Give or take a few million.)  If Perl 6 turns out to be useful for a significant portion of new programmers, I can be satisfied with it not appealing to a significant portion of existing programmers.
[Map of Ingushetia](http://russiatrek.org/regions/ingushetia.gif)
Wow, that's a very well thought out rationalization. Whatever helps you sleep at night dear.
&gt;Step #1 is a rule of God's creation which He is immune to as He is sovereign from it.  You're begging the question.  You're assuming that God exists and has (or doesn't have) certain properties, and then using that assumption as a basis for "proving" that your assumption is correct.  That's circular logic, and is an invalid argument.  *Edit:*  Here, let me give you an example of what I mean:  1. Everything that exists has a cause 2. The universe exists 3. The universe must have had a cause 4. This cause must have had a cause which must have had a cause, ad infinitum. 5. Acting outside of the laws of physics, premise #1 does not apply to time travelers from the future. Conclusion: Since things can't regress infinitely as in #4, time travelers are the only rational explanation for the origin of the universe.  See?  Circular logic allows you to reach *any* conclusion, which is why it's invalid.  &gt;[I]f someone claims that an infinite succession of events had to be concluded before his existence, then he is saying that an infinite succesion of events came to an end, which is a contradiction in terms.  Except that no one supposes that the universe/existence/whatever has concluded.  In an infinite series of events, each event must have an infinite series of events that "concludes" with that event, with another infinite series afterwards.  The only way your previous quote would make sense is if we presume that the universe will cease to exist at some point, thus requiring an infinite series to "conclude".  And even then, there's really no problem.  Think of the integers from 1 to infinity.  The series is infinite even though it has a beginning.  Thus, I see no reason when you can't reverse that and presume an infinite series that never starts, but has a conclusion.  Kind of like counting from negative-infinity to 0.
With all respect to Dr Teo, in Australia this show/source is roundly ridiculed as sensationalist and poor in journalism.  Seriously, its daily-mail worthy in my opinion. Here are some of the other stories from the website: [How to Keep Your Phone Bill In Check](http://aca.ninemsn.com.au/article.aspx?id=622306)  [Food Fads: Is low-fat the right option?](http://aca.ninemsn.com.au/article.aspx?id=622819)  [Exclusive interview with Eva Mendes](http://video.msn.com/?mkt=en-au&amp;brand=ninemsn&amp;tab=m164&amp;mediaid=200686&amp;from=39&amp;vid=371B28AC-FB26-4BBB-8718-1C2B7907A2E1&amp;playlist=videoByTag:mk:en-AU:vs:0:tag:aunews_auaca:ns:MSNVideo_Top_Cat:ps:10:sd:-1:ind:1:ff:8A)
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
Except if it's not confirmed, and so it's pointless to say "well I hear that..."
Still a false dilemma.  Not all Christians view the Bible as a literal text.  There are plenty of Christians who believe in evolution, for instance.   
Exactly.  He loves the sinner and hates the sin.  And there are all manner of sins: pride, envy, wrath, sloth, greed, gluttony &amp; lust.  The _least_ of these is lust. Note that it's still a deadly sin--just not the worst of the bunch.  The worst of the  lot is pride, the overwhelmingly common sin in all ages, the very reason that any other sins are possible.  Pride inspired the list; it inspired the guy who submitted it; it inspired those whose hatred cause the list to be compile in the first place.
They updated it.
Leave Chuck Norris alone!
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
The government agrees that potentially violent movements should be neutralized as quickly as possible, too. Why, just look at those protesters at the Republican National Convention. *Clearly* a threat.  Just saying, that's the kind of thing that mindset can lead to.
An atheist is someone who does not believe in god or a higher form, and an agnostic would be someone who doesn't believe it is possible to know whether there truly is or isn't (and not to mention that agnostics don't care, either. At least, I don't :)
Putin is like Russia's Chuck Norris.
I wouldn't in JMac's karma shoes if the sweet lawd Jeebus hisself come down en axe me.  
These odds are for the average 72 year old, not a 72 year old with the MOST STRESSFUL job on the planet and not a 72 year that has already had FOUR CANCERS.  I'm no doctor but I give McCain about 70% to be alive in 2012.
I would hope that those redditors who were spreading rumors over the last few days would have the decency to be a bit ashamed of themselves, not just for the dehumanizing, Rove-esque attacks, but also for the indecent, public shaming that took place by repeatedly posting images of a slightly chubby 16 year old girl and accusing her of being so large as to be evidence of pregnancy, a girl whose only crime is being born of a woman who would eventually run for public office.  Shame on all of you.
...as opposed to the U.S.? Have you HEARD of FISA?!
Oh man, check this out. This is show is called Alaska HDTV presents "Alaska Podshow #190," which aired Febuary 20th, 2008. About half-way through this show there's a 4 or 5 minute interview with Sarah Palin. She walks (hard to tell how far, but at least a mile given the change in scenery) to work and does not mention once that she's pregnant.  http://alaskapodshow.com/index.php/2008/02/20/my-visit-to-juneau-alaska/
Wow. You caught us. We thought that we had you fooled by picking a constitutional scholar who was the first black president of the Harvard Law Review. Sure, he slogged it out in one of the nations largest state legislatures for eight years before winning a seat in the U.S. senate and building an impressive legislative record along the way. And of course he beat one of the top political families in the country in a drawn-out primary fight that was historic in its length, cost and participants. But you saw through that and caught all 18+ million of us that voted for him. Yeah, racist little pricks like you sure are smart.
It's called C-SPAN and it's boring to watch. Anything more and it loses even more luster.
Well if you rolled around in streets with flowing doodoo, you'd die as a 25 year old too.
The [album](http://picasaweb.google.com/robertson.becca/AmeriCorpsSwearingIn) states:   AmeriCorps Swearing In   Apr 10, 2008  Her son was born a month premature on April 18th, 2008.
**It's a fucking cracker.**
Bullshit. If she was a man being nominated for vice president she'd be treated exactly as Bobby Jindal would have been (minus the exorcist shit).
when you logged on....
It's called "paying for things that cost money to make" aka "capitalism."   Libertarians hate it. 
..Santa?
SO doing this.
So why does the fat chick criticize the goat for eating a lot?
That's what I'm doing.
Palin is not under federal investigation.
*ahhh*, closure.
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
To be honest, I was expecting a stronger showing from the moral relativism crowd on this one.  I'm a bit disappointed.
The issue isn't about just the overall economy in terms of boom and bust, but of the effect of presidents on individual economic classes.  As you will notice, if you read the article,  the rich do significantly better than the poor under republican presidents (still insignificantly worse than under democrat presidents).  Under democrat presidents, the poor do better than the rich.  The issue of wealth distribution has nothing to do with market cycles.
 Yes. Sigh, this video is padded like a prepubescent teeny bopper's bra (edit). Such is the effect of ratings based documentary films.   Gone are the days of old school Nova, The Nature of Things and National Geographic.
Fabricated from familiar, easily accessible materials? Check.  Anthropomorphized into a shape somewhat recognized by humans as similar to their own construction? Check.  Easily manipulated by those with access to the "strings"? Check.  Viewed as comical by rational folk? Check.  Smells like mildew, outdatedness and sheer irrelevance? Check, check, check.  Appealing to children or their intellectual counterparts? Well, duh...  It appears we have a puppet...
Maybe so, but you actually made a good point and hit on a solution, though your way would take too long to accomplish.  The argument being made is that people, outstripping the available resources, are causing global warming. Of the solutions. one of the most obvious is to reduce the number of people using resources until there is a balance achieved.   The problem isn't too few resources, it's too many people. Hence a good war and or a friendly plague. A great solution, provided I'm on the side that survives.
Here I sit so broken hearted  Tried to shit but only farted  Then I tried and took a chance  Tried to fart but shit my pants
Well I guess I was assuming that when you implied that the other choice was 'the Bible is wrong' you actually meant that it was *wrong*....in which case God would probably *not* exist.  What did you mean by 'wrong' if not wrong?
PROTIP: That's a troll. Whoosh.
Thats what you like.
Right?  There's so much more there, and this is what people are going with?  How about the fact that her prior elected experience is as mayor of a town with less than TEN THOUSAND people in it? That she attained that position after a prestige position on the fucking PTA?  That she has a bachelor's degree in Journalism and no solid political science/international relations education or experience?  Rich fodder, all.  Yet half the people on the internet are either talking about how they'd do her or that she's not the baby mama. 
Irkutsk Radio Factory #14 is very proud of most recent triumph, a new type of vacuum tube weighing over two kilograms less than old kind!  In acknowledgment of factory's service to Soviet people, Chairman Putin sent us commemorative plaque to put above lectern in meeting hall.  Whole factory is very proud and vows to increase output above projected levels!
Weapon cheat accepted. Your knife and fork merge into a spork.
Well played.
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
&gt;Now I'm going to disown this discussion, because you seem to want me to provide all sorts of detailed evidence for my claims, while you just provide blanket statements without evidence backing them. I have better things to do with my time than appeasing the desires of someone who is willfully ignoring common human knowledge to advance his "argument".  There you go; provided.   Take a lesson kid. 
Interesting point of view. The flip side of the coin is not clicking on the link if you *don't* want to see it, and also not bothering to comment if all you have to say is "I can find things I like on google."
To what extent can the greater poverty, lesser education and more broken homes of African Americans today and in the past be attributed to their experience as slaves? Who will and who will not receive reparations i.e. what will the threshold be to decide someone is the descendant of a slave? Should the program be extended to American Indians, Irish Americans and whoever? Did Italy did right in paying the Libyans and how did they answer similar questions?
Seems unlikely, although so was her being picked as a running mate.
The only church that enlightens is a burning church.
I think it's time for me to retire my reddit account.
I always thought that the American dream was about achieving wealth and power.  The "how", once you are there, is irrelevant. 
It wouldn't fit inside... "New Product from BlendTec! Massive blender suitable for large gadgets!"
I felt like I was jacking off to Elvis Presley. Can someone tell me why?
Yup.In a New York minute.&gt;
That doesn't even make sense.
People are so ignorant of the law.  I can arrest as many people as I like with probable cause and never read them their "miranda rights" not once.  They will all be convicted if the evidence is there.  "Miranda rights" are only read before QUESTIONING a subject while in custody.  IF you fail to read them then anything they say is inadmissable.  I love you people who think TV and the Intrawebs is real life.  It makes my job so much easier.
Have *you* seen reddit lately? It's been [full of articles](http://www.reddit.com/search?q=lolcode&amp;x=0&amp;y=0) and comments referencing lolcode. It's common knowledge.
4 marriages isn't too uncommon.  More telling is that two of the marriages ended with the man deciding he would rather shoot himself in the neck with a shotgun than wake up next to her again.
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
Arrrr.... thar be tygers.
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
Bristol looks like she's "post partum" and wearing a nursing bra to me. birth certificate will solve a lot
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
The kind of comment that separates the computer scientists from the script kiddies (of all ages).
I'm not a photographer, but that Glen Canyon pic is real gem! The last one is impressive, also.
Have you watched Grave of the Fireflies?
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
Yes it is.
I try not to be a "Mac missionary," and indeed I find that whole thing annoying myself.  Basically I personally use Macs because I'm used to them, they do have certain advantages that fit with the way I work, I like the interface better and so on.  There's some really cool, well-written software for Mac, too, that has no Windows equivalent.  Little reasons that add up.  It's perfectly possible for other people, like some of my friends, to disagree with those little reasons and use other systems, including Windows.  They generally don't use _stock_ Windows, but then I don't use stock OSX.
A gasoline-powered air compressor is not even close to the same thing as a gasoline powered engine.  The gasoline would power an air compressor, which would be temporarily stored in the air tanks, and used to power the engine to move the car as needed.  I'm not an expert on the car by any means, but that's my understanding.  If you believe their website, it gets 106 mpg, so losses in power efficiency are more than made up for by reducing the weight of the vehicle.  That's just my guess.
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
Can you please post the direct download links for the other disks? The EA site with the links is unavailable but the one you already posted for Soviet works! Edit: I changed the last part of the URL to "AlliedDisc.rar" and it worked. Unless there are more than two disks I should be good to go...
Scared me like our Constitution (all rights suspended)
In VA, the hand cigs out for free at schools, post offices, and DMV's.
Downmodded for not using the [politics] subreddit.
Man, laughed pretty hard.
Except that he was apparently fine her first term, until supported her opponent. Personally, I don't really care about this firing, which on the face of it looks patently political.  She was, as the judge pointed out, within her rights to do so.  But why deny the obvious?  What difference does it make if it was political?  "not fully supporting her efforts to govern" doesn't deny he was fired for not "fully supporting" her efforts to get reelected to govern.  Who cares?  What point is gained in pretending it was other than political?  
How babby Trig formed?
If you mean total transparency of all activities to the public, then yes.
"Cruised into a bar on the shore . . . "  DLLAL D D D DLLAL
If  being a Mayor here …  http://flickr.com/photos/87119361@N00/319098225  … qualifies for executive experience I wonder if it stings for Rudy, who was mayor of the capital of the world, that he isn't the VP candidate.
Best Banksy ever.
I have always thought that this is how dogs drink water.. that kind of "reverse bowl" thing. I guess I've spent too much time watching my dog drink. But I have always seen his tongue curl backwards when he was drinking.
When your mom logged on...
Both replies were at 0 points. I had to do something. Can we still be friends?
Please don't judge Australia by the stupidity which is aca...  I BEG YOU.
I would use Ubuntu, or any Linux distro if piece of shit ATI would actually write better drivers for their video  cards.  Right now I can't get anything working past a basic 1024x768 setup. No bigger res, no dual monitors (Ok, I get two monitors but they just display the same thing). It blows because I REALLY REALLY want to use a Linux distro, but I REALLY REALLY like my dual monitors and high res. Vista sucks :(
Best game on the Genesis by far. . . thanks for bring back some great memories.
No, I don't want it on myself and I'm not going to become a hypocrite and say that I want it on selective groups of people.
Feeling superior to Americans because you're Canadian is like feeling superior to H2 owners because you drive a hybrid Escalade.
I couldn't agree more. It is called, "Public Service" for a reason. It should be the most "unwanted job" in the United States. But in fact it is the most sought after position. I wonder why? ;)
Another site: http://www.moscowtimes.ru/article/600/42/370550.htm  "Yevloyev was found lying near a Nazran hospital with a bullet in his temple, Interfax reported."
No, but teaching yourself that same drive that it takes to life weights can be put into the business world.  Arnold was rich before he was in hollywood thanks to smart investing.
Well, I suppose it's good that I ignore all calls anyway, huh?
Exactly.  Better to buy land since they're not making any more of it.
You have never been to New Orleans I take it.  I have personally witnessed people shitting in the middle of the street there.
it's the panic button if Mc Cain doesn't win the election
Jeeez Irony.. long time no see.  Come back more often.  We just don't get enough good laughs. The answer to the repetitive question, is: yes it's wrong. If hoping for a "snow day" is your best shot, just go home. (Electronic voting machines notwithstanding)  
Please don't demean the politics subreddit.
If it were an objective study of the Bible, including its shortcomings, then I'd be okay with this. It won't turn out like that, though.
Look at this sobering assessment of Purdue football
Upvoted for fairy rape
Older than dirt.
There's an Anchorage paper that quotes a number of Republican state leaders saying no one asked them a thing, that there weren't any campaign lead staff asking questions. Yes, is the answer.  Normally.  
&gt;"We cannot continue to rely on our military in order to achieve the national security objectives that we've set. We've got to have a **civilian national security force** that's just as powerful, just as strong, just as well-funded." -Barack Obama  I wonder if this would be Blackwater?
No. Their machinations and plots are concocted not during office hours, but in private, under the cover of darkness.  Leave them but a sliver of privacy and it will be exploited to subvert the whole system.
Exactly what I came here to say. FAIL.
:P  Lloyd has cruel parents.  They were going to name him Abdul, but elected not to.   For the record, I sport a fairly Irish name myself, but have never stepped foot on Ireland.  Nowadays, a name is almost just a name. Or for Gweneth Paltrow; a fruit.
You know that you can create as many subreddits as you want right?
Or maybe just the way he was saying it.  She's under no obligation to keep any political appointee for any reason.  If there was some sort of systematic purge of potential whistle blowers there might be reason for concern.  As it is you've got the Governor firing a whopping grand total of three - only one of which was remotely in a position to be anything like a whistle blower.  Basically, so what?  Appointees serve at the pleasure of the executive.
*fap fap fap*
I agree. It's stupid to explain what happened with this question with an ad hominem, masturbatory, and childish attack against Spolsky and Atwood. Stuff like this happens in any internet community--digg, reddit--for any number of factors beyond how you create the website: the type of people you attract, how long you've been around, pure luck.
I'm not sure... but I think Sarah Palin is worse than McCain. *shudder*
I haven't seen any clear evidence of brain tumours but stupidity is certainly increasing.
Only Mr. Norris would do it that way.
As my name implies I am a huge Hillary fan and I will never forgive Barack Obama and the Democrat establishment for what they did to Hillary Clinton. Hillary has devoted her life to the Democratic party and they treated her like a battered wife. So far I am intrigued by Sarah Palin. Here is a strong woman that didn't get where she is because of a man. I don't like the idea of voting for McCain so instead I am going to vote for Sarah.
But they have nude beaches in Europe, not to mention the promiscuous chicks and virtually no age requirement to purchase alcohol. 
Oh I had a look at your comments history. Looks like "A2TheK" account is used solely to write comments supportive of Palin regardless of what the topic is. You "A2TheK" are a propagandist spiv.
Why, I would ask, isn't the dialog box API easier to use?  Seems like there shouldn't be any "presets."  Instead, you should be able to make your own "presets," easily, and save them for later use, thus making no button layout harder than any other.  Basic programming books and IDEs should come with a few canned preset files, but that's up to them.  This is the way Mac OS X does it, I think.  There's even a GUI app called InterfaceBuilder for laying out interfaces, which you can then name and call from code.  But the Mac does seem to have a lot more built-ins...
add in this video  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9qUVQDmLf7s
Sorry I don't get it.  I couldn't score any acid today...
maybe she was trying to purposely have a miscarriage so she wouldnt have a down baby. that way she can say that it wasnt abortion and maintain her pro-lifer status.
Gambling, liquor and the mob IS the American dream!
&gt;One of the official justifications for patents is that patents would encourage inventors to publish their techniques instead of keeping them secret, so the inventions won't disappear with them. After any kind of rational examination, this justification appears as completely bogus. If secrecy were a working method to ensure an indefinite monopoly on a technique, and the monopoly were the prime motivator of inventors, then inventors would certainly not publish in exchange of a patent that gave them a monopoly for only a few years, when they could have an indefinite monopoly by not publishing! More generally, the patent system is only meaningful when reverse-engineering would otherwise allow the invention to be universally deployed despite attempts to preserve secrecy. Thus, the technical effect of the patent system is always to slow down the way inventions are spread, never to speed it up!   Reverse engineering carries a much higher cost (all of it basically wasted) than reading a patent.  Thus, it would distribute information only to a few prospective competitors, while a patent would make the information universally available.
No, those shirts.  Sorry for not giving into reddit's paranoid delusions. I'll wait and make a choice beyond one picture, an angry headline and this post later.
sort of.  I'm suspicious of anyone acting to preserve a species in a collectivist method.  I have absolutely no problem with, in fact I completely support them, people who preserve species in a free market orientated way.  The countless examples of it successfully in action are a great testiment that are frequently ignored, whilst the obvious deficiencies of collectivist attempts to preserve species are also ignored.  For example;  The white Rhino in Africa was being hunted to extinction by poachers for its horn.  This was because the Rhinos were collectively owned.  Just like the overfishing in the sea.  Just like the Bison in North America.  The government finally gave permission for the poachers to purchase their own land.  Now the species has entirely recovered, and there are more Rhinos in the poacher's territory than the government's!  Fact is, with property rights and free markets, any species that is valuable to humans and scarce, will be protected.  Even species that don't give tangible goods to humans are protected, for example; pets?  The massive swoths of private land in places like the Amazon that are being preserved naturally so that people can enjoy them in their wild state.  The countless private charities set up to support these reserves.
Bust in and SHOOT them.... fixed it for you...
That's unfortunate... I guess they called CNN/Time and requested that their master plan be unveiled later.
http://www.sadtrombone.com/
So scared I felt like I was drowning in San Francisco Bay (all bridges suspended)
Since when has the VP choice not been nearly entirely politically motivated?  Look at the 1864 Republican VP nominee.  I can't think of an election since that hasn't used the VP nominee to shore up more support for the presidential nominee.
How about an actual poll at the top, only available in the poll subreddit?  Badabing!
x50? It'd take even more than that to get me playing that horrible game. You have to be really bored to put up with that grind. I never got past like 35 and I felt horrible about myself for wasting so much of my life doing absolutely nothing. The grind isnt even remotely interesting. I used to play while watching online class lectures, because it requires absolute zero thought to play that game.  The economy used to be fun, but that was all I liked. 
It is Neu
wait, is this on reddit or Digg? I'm having trouble telling...  http://www.reddit.com/r/programming/comments/6yxqc/use_verbs_instead_of_exclamations_as_labels_on/c058vca  yeah, and i agree too. totally.
No shit.
Fascinating. You either get busy living or get busy dying. Trent almost went the latter.
I'm pretty sure that's part of his problem.
What a bitch.
Obviously, he subdued the tiger with a Sambo choke hold of some kind, but was so modest about the whole thing that he made up the story about the tranquilizer gun so as to avoid overshadowing Peter the Great.  It's completely plausible.
You see, this time, it's Satan.  Duh.
With this pack of smokes... I thee wed.   I now pronounce you "man and bitch". 
Most Americans don't realize how completely desolate and lifeless things are in the USA on Thanksgiving night when you're a foreigner (and so not used to the Thanksgiving custom) and living by yourself. It's the one night of the year when EVERYTHING is closed, even restaurants.  We have Thanksgiving in Canada too, but it's not nearly as big a deal.
Don't believe the hype
That's not really logical at all.  Especially consider what would happen if you translated that literally into Spanish or Chinese, or even just took it over into Britain where the "logic" might be different.  Big mistake.  Dialogs need to make only one kind of sense, immediately, no matter what.  Anything else, while in some cases it might be not immediately a problem, is just bad design.
Have we learned *nothing* from the Native Americans?  You're not going to get rain with a prayer; you have to do a dance for that.  Honestly...
I'm going to stand up for you here, in a way. I do agree with the article and with the comments here: Stack Overflow will probably be misleading, wrong, and amateurish when it comes to questions that require experience and knowledge. A quick peek at the site after setting the magic beta cookie confirms this.  But in the real world of being a day-to-day programmer, I don't have so many questions/issues that require deep experience or knowledge; when I do, I turn to a book or to someplace more appropriate.  I do however constantly run into irritating, time-wasting trivia: under-documented APIs, buggy implementations with nonobvious workarounds, magic incantations, etc. Things like, from the site, "how do I make the HTML page print in landscape when the user selects print"? Or even better: "C# console program can’t send fax when run as a scheduled task".  There is a place for a site that collects this sort of answer, and I welcome it. Maybe it won't make for very interesting lunchtime reading (except perhaps to troll the people obviously posting CS homework), but it *will* come up in Google when I paste in an error number or stack trace. Which, if I recall correctly, was one of their main goals for the site in the first place.
Running for Vice President isn't a job.  It's your life.  Pity that you can't see the difference.
Here's a comparison from a post on metafilter:  &gt;Palin's experience: After being selected as the runner up in the 1984 Miss Alaska contest, Palin served two terms on the Wasilla, Alaska City Council from 1992 to 1996, was elected mayor of Wasilla in 1996, and ran unsuccessfully for Lieutenant Governor in 2002.  &gt;After charging ethical violations by state Republican Party leaders,[2] she won election in 2006 by first defeating the incumbent governor in the Republican primary, then a former Democratic Alaskan governor in the general election.   &gt;Obama's experience: A graduate of Columbia University and Harvard Law School, where he served as president of the Harvard Law Review, Obama worked as a community organizer and practiced as a civil rights attorney before serving in the Illinois Senate from 1997 to 2004. He taught constitutional law at the University of Chicago Law School from 1992 to 2004. Following an unsuccessful bid for a seat in the U.S. House of Representatives in 2000, he announced his campaign for the U.S. Senate in January 2003. After a primary victory in March 2004, Obama delivered the keynote address at the Democratic National Convention in July 2004. He was elected to the Senate in November 2004 with 70% of the vote.  &gt;As a member of the Democratic minority in the 109th Congress, he helped create legislation to control conventional weapons and to promote greater public accountability in the use of federal funds. He also made official trips to Eastern Europe, the Middle East, and Africa. During the 110th Congress, he helped create legislation regarding lobbying and electoral fraud, climate change, nuclear terrorism, and care for returned U.S. military personnel. After announcing his presidential campaign in February 2007, Obama emphasized withdrawing American troops from Iraq, energy independence, decreasing the influence of lobbyists, and promoting universal health care as top national priorities.  Pretty even, right?
To me, terrorism is the use of violence *specifically* (i.e., collateral damage not included here) against civilians and non-combatants in order to advance a given political ambition or will.   The bombing of Hiroshima and Nagasaki are interesting cases. When in Total War (i.e., when the entire society is geared toward fighting and supporting the fighting) civilians *are* sometimes argued to be fair game as they all advance the cause of your enemy's military. Also, Nagasaki was a military port; the port itself was populated almost exclusively my miltary personnell and families. 
Pat Summitt, the coach of the Tennessee women's basketball team, was on a recruiting trip out of state, but rushed back to Tennessee because she wanted her son to born in the state.
Pretty low, but after reading all the heavy comments above yours I'm not going to lie and say I didn't laugh at yours.
Funny how all the dems are screaming "Morality" versus "illegality" all of sudden.  I remember them singing a diffrent tune once.  Its not "Illegal" to get a BJ in the oval office, its only "immoral" so its ALL OK!!
I suggest you personally visit and stay in villages in India rather that having it told to you.  Also, here's an anecdote: My parents met some native people in a New York store. One of the first questions they asked my parents was "What is your last name?". Which is the modern day equivalent of "What is your caste?".  The caste system is dying...but not fast enough.
&gt; `&gt;_&gt; test`  That's monospaced font, though.  &gt; And I finally found out how to make a Wikipedia link with parentheses work.  I know about the backslash-escaping, but it doesn't work on a leading right angle bracket.
&gt; There you go; provided.  There you go again, misunderstanding what I said.  I said "disown the discussion".  That is not equivalent to "done with me".  I'm confident that, if you asked for an apple and I handed you an orange, you'd munch on it happily in your belief that you were eating an apple.  Again: stoopid at the level that you can't read, or just trolling random people for fun?
Hey cyd, I found the wikipedia entry on the bridge (I think this was already submitted to reddit), and an article last year by CNN describing the cancellation. Since you came up with that great line, I thought you might want to use it for a title... I can see it now: *Palin on the Bridge to Nowhere, "thanks but no thanks...and we'll keep the money"*  http://www.cnn.com/2007/US/09/22/alaska.bridge.ap/  The wiki also has a bunch of other links that might be good. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gravina_Island_Bridge  Even if you don't use the line to title the link I found, I hope you'll find a use for it - it's great!
&gt;If she wants to keep it, she can suck a massive portion of the father's wages for 18 years.  *she* does not suck the wages, *he* pays for a child to be reared without him.   You don't want an 18 year responsibility, put a rubber on. It's a lot cheaper. 
Stars and planets seem to be found in the sky, so I'd start there. At night, if you can manage it. 
David Brooks is such an effing hack. But you don't get your Republican card stamped without being one, anyway. 
Me!
Aww, Ron Paul gets his own special convention?
 I'd like to see you carry a stencil in broad daylight or at night and paint on a prominent street...   And, this, not as a meth addict with shit stains on his pants with no awareness of his surroundings... On top of this, his art is undeniably good. It's not even picasso'esque, where there was doubt *in the public's mind* as to the man's abilities.  [edit]
God my eyes!!!! My Ears!!!! That scrolling yellow text on red background has made me blind while the music assaulted my ears.
I'd pay to watch that.
Fucked up vacation. But who goes to an Egyptian-style hotel in Bulgaria? 
Cello.
Hey, until Reddit gets &lt;spoiler&gt; tag support...
FTA: "The twist-yourself-in-knots-to-oppose-Palin-on-grounds-of-inexperience exercise being indulged in by those otherwise ecstatic about Barack Obama and indifferent to his lack of experience is truly astounding to behold."
asshole
Said in a reddit post.
Your other examples are spot on, but I believe Pearl Harbor killed more or less exclusively military actors and ships (+ one hospital ship, but war sucks, so deal with it).   Pearl Harbor, in the strange world of war ethics, was not immoral. 
You cannot be serious.  If I were Hillary Clinton I'd come to your house and kick your ass.  Everything Hillary has fought for for her entire career is undermined by McCain and his weak choice for vp.  Can't you see that you are being pandered to?  What an insult to Hillary. 
He definitely does not work alone anymore than someone like Kostabi does- although, there is no need to punch a clock with him, as there is with the former. His physical body was not present for the LA and AL (get it?!) pieces, and whether or not MS is next, is anyone's guess.  They have one thing neither AL nor LA had, and that's Kool-Aid Pickles, so maybe those will just be eaten en masse and that'll be that!  But indeed, these are not by his hand... though how would anyone know, since his legal identity has not (yet) been revealed? I hope he trusts everyone he does business with (oops, Art with) else, that anonymity is not for long...
In other news, the sun rose in the east this morning, the water in the ice cube trays froze, and a woman somewhere faked an orgasm...
It reminds me of this picture of a [roast beef](http://img522.imageshack.us/img522/3762/roastbeefuf6.jpg "Never gonna give you up, never gonna let you down... Never gonna run around and desert you. -- Never gonna make you cry, never gonna say goodbye. Never gonna tell a lie, and hurt you.") sandwich I saw. (generally safe for work -- not "NSFW," just a gross sandwich.)
I'm not afraid to admit that the first time i heard this song i broke down and cried right in my car.  It's just the perfect ending to a perfect album.  I was wondering what are some songs that have had the greatest emotional impact on all of you guys out there.
If kippah is a euphemism for condom, well, a girl has to take the pill EVERY DAY....
if it's bosnia or kosovo, it's self-determination, if it's one of our guys, then they're just protecting their territorial integrity right?
Nothing.
Well said Sir. I lol'ed
Hahahaha that's wicked! They should get him to play some music on the show!
I don't know about "don't do drugs", but "don't inject cocaine intravenously" seems like advice most people can agree on.
Remember, when you buy Dairy Farmers, you're supporting real Australian dairy farmers...and their Japanese beer making overlords.
Where the hell is the "sometimes" button?
Nonsense, we all know black people don't swim...   I kid, I kid.
If I had to guess, the concept of a more flexible MessageBox has probably been on the Windows drawing board for a very long time.  But there are only so many hours in the day, and other features have been more important.  With the release of Windows Vista, programmers now have the option of using [Task Dialogs](http://msdn.microsoft.com/en-us/library/aa511299.aspx), which are a customizable version of the MessageBox--exactly what we're talking about.  Unfortunately, to use this feature you have to target Windows Vista as your minimum operating system, something few programmers are ready to do yet.
let him/her say whatever he/she wants, just downmod him/her.
Half the people on the internet will do anything that lets them.  :)
a female GALDIATOR!  GALDIATORS UNITE!@
It's generally understood the Romans were overrun by ethnic minorities who corrupted their culture and gene pool.
Except picking a mutual fund based on past performance is not very smart at all. 
Um . . . no.
Yeah, what is it with a bomb having a circle parachute? Don't you want the bomb to hit the fastest possible?
Yah it sure is bizarre that a story about good human interface design talks about OS X.
&gt; Be very careful with unqualified medical advice.  And then you point us to wikipedia?..
Will these republicans ever notice that I couldn't care less about them?
 There's two ways of looking at this: either you think that you're 2 bit sarcasm is the bees knees, or you are missing something that others are getting.   I'm placing my bet on the second. Take a hint, read some of the comments in this thread and you might understand why you are thick.
[We're everywhere.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Technology_evangelist)
Well my point is that the car is bullshit. And a gasoline powered air compressor IS a gasoline powered engine, mated to an air compressor. You're an engineer and didn't know that? What do you think turns the compressor, a turbine or something? Obviously the best way to convert gasoline energy into motion (which is needed to turn an air compressor) is with an ICE, otherwise cars wouldn't use them...
McCain probably added 5 percent to his polling, for all you geniuses who are laughing right now.  When factored in with Republican gerrymandering and poll fraud, that puts him at 65% to Obama's 55%.
Jeff Atwood, "I'd rather make my own mistakes (for things I care about) than blindly inherit other people's mistakes."  Why do people read his blog again?
this is fairly old now. he is the crazy dancing priest from here in ireland. he is called Cornelius "Neil" Horan. i think he thought the world was ending or something and wanted to warn people. he has also danced outside buckingham palace for peace and i'm sure if you type in "crazy irish priest ruins olympic marathon" into google you will find out more about some of his adventures.
Playboy actually has pretty good (non-naked woman) content. It often features solid interviews with pretty important people and some good fiction.  I'd even say it has more journalistic content and integrity than, say, CNN or Fox News.
As someone who did the first Gaim port to Maemo in the Nokia 770 days, I can say it was totally Gaim's fault. The code for the contact list was terribly bad, which caused the application to block when more than three or four contacts change their state at the same time. Getting online (which causes every online contact to change his state) with more than 30 contacts blocked Gaim for more than 1 minute. I can't remember the exact details, but I had to change a lot of code to make that work faster in the 770. As for the browser, I think they totally messed up when they replaced the Opera browser engine with the Mozilla one. Ok, the latter is free, but the former was a lot faster (probably Opera has more experience than Mozilla on embedded devices). However, I'm no longer involved in Maemo development, so perhaps things have changed a bit.
I got too good at fixing broken things in Windows, so I moved on to an environment in which I can break things more easily.
Exactly.  I bet the library director was putting books in the library, or permitting liberally biased websites to appear on the library computers.  While we can't track down millions of White House emails, we can surely monitor the Wasilla public library.  
How can I possibly downvote such cuteness?
Pff, that's nothing.  Dick Cheney shot a mother fucker in the face!  Beat that!
I find myself using cancel a lot in large apps that take a long time to open.  If I try to press Cmd-W (yes, Mac user here), and hit Q instead, I'd certainly like to be given another chance to decide if I really want to quit.  Same reason I have my browser set to warn me if I try to quit with more than one page open.  I don't quit without explicitly saving first, so the "cancel" button provides a commonly-used "no I meant to do something else first" option.  Oh, and one other much more serious problem.  Undo history is lost when closing.  If I didn't mean to either close or quit, and press that command accidentally, I'm now stuck between losing my changes or my undo history.  This is not a fun choice.  Of course I'm _not_ because the system is sensible and puts a Cancel option in.  So yes, a yes/no question shouldn't really have 3 answers, but that dialog is really asking two questions.  Do you _really_ want to quit (because you appear to be in the middle of working, not having saved), and do you want to save while doing so.  There are only 3 answers instead of 4 because not quitting makes saving irrelevant, but it's really two questions.
Just don't leave the room...
Evidently, Palin *does* have some of the skills necessary for higher office:  "deception, insider-dealing and rank hypocrisy."
He'll probably grow up to be a Republican.
This isn't doing more with less. This is a piece of recreational equipment, common at camps:  http://www.winnamocka.com/blob.html  It's about as improvisational as a swing set.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Orb_(paranormal)
As far as I know (as a TextMate user, but not much of a Ruby one), TextMate doesn't provide:   1) A console plugin  2) A jump-to-related-file macro  3) Any sort of irb support  4) Usable autocompletion -- certainly not better than Jedit's  5) A debugger interface  I'm looking at the bundle built-in for Ruby and I don't see a "tidy", either, though I doubt that would be too hard to add.
bonefish
Thank you; this is a ton more important than who the mother of the baby is, etc.   McCain's campaign has been deceptive or silent on a lot of issues and this is one of them.
It's not terrorism. It's Shock and Awe.
I got into an accident on the Golden Gate (my car rear-ended)
Heaven forbid someone have a different opinion than you.
Are you mad? Wouldn't look good to shoot a dangerous tiger about to attack of group of humans? What kind of psychotic tree hugger would object to that?
cute overload awwwwwwwwwwww!
You probably won't like it... not even I do, though I agree with it wholeheartedly.... Alester Crowley.
yeah, my friends and I played that game nonstop.  I think it was our primary multiplayer game until Mario Kart 64.
Nope, I can't claim that one, it came from Alester Crowley, one of the most famous Satanists.
D'awwwwwww
Yeah, cougars don't hunt tigers...
How not to post a youtube link.
Where have you all been? Chicken soup for the dog lovers soul, Canidae were on the recall list.  Most all canned food is manufactured by Menu Foods. Like Lisa Y said "They use different recipes for different brands, as ordered/formulated by the individual brand. " They just put it all together for each company.  Nutro's pet food has been making pets sick have some have died but they haven't recalled it. Pedigree just recalled some of their food. Do you know that Mars Petcare make both brands? The fact is most commercial pet foods are made from less than human quality ingredients? 
Have some humility, it's just a joke.
Within the next year or forever?
**This is even more important than it was yesterday.**  Spread the "Katrina Cake" picture:  Here is the link, which you can copy and paste in to your email(s):  http://www.newsweek.com/id/133551  **Post it.  Send it early.  Send it often.  Send it again.**
All that watching, just for a second of a backflip at the end? I mean, they could have at least done a slo-mo repeat!
I don't agree with the implied misogyny in the message.  She can, and should, still be laughed out of politics.
Sounds unlikely to me.
I suspect you're being downmodded for consistent strawman attacks, not for your repeated love of rationality.  Strawman 1: &gt; If religion itself is the cause of evil...  'a cause', not 'the cause'.  Strawman 2: &gt; Videos whose sad logic is "the Bible is not literally true, therefore there is no god"...  The subtext of the video is more concerned with "your god does not exist and your ideas are stupid" as opposed to "no god exists anywhere I know everything about the universe lol".   To actually respond to your point:  &gt; To claim that religion is generally bad for society doesn't fit with human history. Memes, like genes, evolve; the meme of religion would have been lost to the ages but for the fact that religion seems to give some unnamed advantage.  The advantage is to the reproductive survival of the meme itself. There is absolutely nothing that means it has to be advantageous to those human beings themselves (although it can).  You're familiar with HIV, and Cholera etc right?  Just because something exists, doesn't mean it's good for humans.  Religious group solidarity is a great way to arbitrarily define an in-group and and out-group, and to justify war, torture, censorship and all manner of human rights abuses against the out-group.  Your in-group will gain some reproductive advantage from this scapegoating, but *in what world is that a good thing*?
They can have their rights when the do their jobs.
I've seen cuter.
If she had been closer to the end, the energy would have gone more into putting her further down range with less height. Also, I think a ski vest would be a better choice here.
Sho' will be a flash back to a ground attack in Hanoi or Haiphong.  
????  Profit?
Blogspam.  Actual link:  http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap080831.html
That's like applying for a senior management job and turning in a resume touting "Senior class president" and "Eagle Scout" 
&gt;See this tongue? It's the same one I had when I was a POW...
Nothing says "redneck" quite like a $3000 piece of equipment. http://www.the-blob.com/blobbing.html  Oh, wait, how is this redneck?
Your lack of faith disturbs me, McCain.
Why give the example of the KGB, when a more recent example is available: the FBI?
There certainly is evidence of rising levels of sockpuppetry around here in the past few weeks, but this isn't it. A2TheK has been here for all of 2 days and hasn't yet submitted a thing. Call me back when this poster has been relentlessly doing nothing but promoting Palin for a couple of weeks. Not that doing this would work here ...  (I think Palin's a glitter-wrapped gift to the Dems, myself. I can't wait for the VP debate Oct. 3.) 
STONE COLD
Wouldn't know that listening to Wolf Blitzer tonight.
Thanks. I had read about Kava Kava and wanted to try it earlier in the year, but it is banned in Canada and I can't get it here.
Is there a single independent TV channel left in Russia?
JESUS CHRIST MONKEY BALLS!
I actually intended this to be a rhetorical question.
Heh.  I guess I'm lucky that the bars have always been open on Christmas night where I live.
http://www.wunderground.com/wundermap/?lat=29.95751953&amp;lon=-90.07685852&amp;zoom=6
I didn't come up with the idea myself. A mailing list I am on sent me a lot of info about her including that. She is very hand in glove with the oil industry and her husband works for them.If you read that page, well, she's a real piece of work. She's against abortion even in case of rape, incest or serious birth defects. Her last child was born with Down's Syndrome. And it's a really weird situation. Some people say she was not pregnant but it was her daughter who was. When her water supposedly broke she gave a speech, flew 12 hours from Texas, then drove 2 hours, to "deliver" the baby at home. Some people believe it was her daughter who was pregnant and when the daughter's labor started she had to rush home to pretend to deliver the baby herself. Other people think that despite being anti-abortion she did that instead of going to a hospital where she was in the hope that the baby would die during the delay in delivery. It's all very freaky. 
Yes, that's what I'm saying.   Maybe my comparison to open source software was a bad one given your personal experience, but I was hoping you'd think about the process of change it is subjected to as opposed to closed source.  Not to digress, but give Linux time, it'll get there.  I started using it in 1995 and it was beyond usable as a client workstation OS.
&gt;Putin, taking a break from lambasting the West over Georgia...  Seriously? We Reddittors bitch at one another for politicizing a funny subreddit thread and Reuters thought that would be appropriate?
Good stuff, but unusably slow.  [jQuery UI](http://ui.jquery.com/demos) has something similar, non-canvas implementation, and much faster.
You could go to digg and get the ads replaced with semi-porn images of jailbait hockin' t-shirts that make you wonder what kind of parents were okay with the photos.
It's blood-color.  Seems like it would be a "built-in."  Though there are some cultures that behave differently, which is why we localize.
This is really like middle school bullying write large. 
I didnt say it was perfect, I said it pwns Windows, which it does.
Look outward vice inward.
O_o you're a christian a nice pagan/Cosmic admirer could probably actually be friends with.  Care to come by for tea next week?
Not with human beings.  Human beings have no claws, no speed, they are weak, they have no fangs, they have none of the necessary body attributes required to deal with the world through force.  Their only strength is their brain, the ability to form abstract thoughts and plan ahead, etc.  And then there are natural laws like you benefit from your own labor.  No one can break that law.  You pick an apple, then you have that apple.  You control it.  You can give it away, you can eat it, whatever.  You have the right to free speech.  By nature, you can speak freely.  You have the right to control your own body, etc.  That kind of stuff is natural law.
Why you trying to read that word? You a fag or something? :P
blehhh, I smell poor people.
Downmodding is a sin?  Damn, I didn't get The Good Book 2.0.
Steve Jobs is related to this, how, exactly?
Ah, my home town,  This kind of thing happens there. 
I'd take the left bench. If the middle was thr right temp, someone would be sitting there.
Wolf Blitzer has the name and the face of a man who should be playing an airplane pilot in a 70s soft-core sex romp.
What is Haiku?
You might enjoy reading about former Russian Defense Minister Alexander Lebed. Legend has it that one time he walked past a line of military personnel and punched each one in the face, and broke every jaw.
Plenty.
His bio is more entertaining than the article:  &gt;Mike Green is a Christian conservative, 12-year military veteran. He is a former talk radio host, public speaker, award-winning columnist and the Content Editor for a daily newspaper in Southern Oregon. Mike is also the author of two books: The WHOLE Truth About the U.S. War on Terror: Answers to Every Question You Never Knew to Ask and The Perfect Method for Finding the Perfect Man.
Praying or working magik for anything with meanness in your heart is just....  ....  .... Well, case in point, I guess....
&gt; (all of it basically wasted) [In a frictionless, ideal world](http://www.reddit.com/r/programming/comments/6uvyx/as_a_software_developer_i_can_tell_you_that_i/).   
We haven't gotten that far yet.  It's easier to just talk about how cool this would all be.  ...
If you have problems and no money to solve them, stacking on new problems seems like less and less of a big deal.  Likewise, fixing just a few of them doesn't seem like much of an anxiety-reducing enterprise.  Being able to afford to have the oil pan on your oversized gocart cleaned out is a pretty good feeling after watching that needle bottom out on your commute.  Being able to elicit the assistance of strangers is almost always another great thing, and that's really the point of a universal conversion medium like money. Some people have to go through a few natural disasters before they can see the fleeting nature of the value of furniture that doesn't come from Ikea.  Likewise spending a silly percent of your income on your wardrobe doesn't make sense when you realize you could probably wear the same thing to work two days in a row and nobody would notice. 
That was a fantastic article. I liked it a lot. Anyway, I'm a big fan of his music, though I have to admit I've pirated most of it. I'm going to say though, when I could buy it, I did, and I made a vow that I'll give him 100$ if I ever see him.
invisible LAZOR!!
I guess I disagree- I don't think "rattling people" out of their stupid beliefs is the way to get things done. You catch more flies with honey. I think if we address the moderate and liberal religious side, and tell them - "Hey, we think your beliefs are a bit outdated, but we don't hate you, we just hate the people who take your outdated beliefs and do stupid things with them."   I guess my point is that fighting fundamentalism and puritanical belief systems cannot be done as an atheist effectively. The only way to have change in a fundamentalist church is to evoke change in a slightly more liberal church, which in turn requires change in a more liberal church, and so on. It's like feminists fighting extreme patriarchy in the middle east. They can make as much noise as they want, but they have _no standing_ in the patriarchy, so the patriarchy ignores them. The only way you can fight a closed belief system, is to get a slightly less closed form of the same belief to make it socially unnacceptable -- amongst the belief's own social circles -- to believe the more extreme form.   I agree- we should aim for churches to have no special treatment under the law- we should not tolerate psychopathic reactions to minor events like taking a cracker out of church. But- we only hurt our own limited credibility by running around screaming "You're a bunch of idiots, believing in a talking snake and a zombie savior!" That's like telling a woman that she looks fat, it may be true, but you don't do it, because it just gets her angry and she stops listening to you.  I also disagree that my grandmother's (or anyone else who's reaction is similar) is unjustifiable. It may be _baseless_, but trying to say "You're not allowed to be upset by this, it's just a cracker" isn't going to make her, or anyone, amenable to actually critically thinking about what they believe.   I guess I should have realized that a non-extreme anti-theistic view on this subreddit would not get downmodded to hell. But hey, I value rational positions rather than the wonderfully unthunk position that is fundamentalistic antitheism.  Stupid is stupid, no matter who's thinking it.
Dion would be way better. Let's invest in green technologies. Let's be more European(ie Scandinavia) in our approach and less American. Harper is intent on locking us into American policy. He's about as creative as a rock.
What you hate is nature. 
Yup. He was inspired to write it while riding his dinosaur, Bertrand, to an All-American Mud Bog Tractor Pull.
It's not just you.
maybe her phonecard is low on credit?
The pets, however, are not paying for the services while citizens are (through taxes).  The whole metaphor is stupid mainly due to the fact that humans are marginally less helpless than pets.
bwahaha. i almost exploded. we need a [goat] subreddit.
http://achewood.com/index.php?date=04172007
What, you missed all of the snark in your rush to brand everyone as not anti-Commie enough for your tastes?
This is just wrong.  I think we should all steal the crackers, hundreds of them and hold them hostage at gunpoint until this guy get's his job back.  Who is with me?
Longest Lived Dog was 29 Years, eating a Vegan Diet of Lentils, Rice and Vegetables  'Dog Food' is waste from the Meat Industry.
Ohh wow! perhaps he will give some his extra money to some of you greasy dirty redditors....nah, doubt it.  Take a shower dirty hippies. No matter what Kiefer Sutherland *says* he's not going to give his fortune to your zit faced dorky ass....
All I heard was someone laughing at some moron saying stupid things. That isn't any way indicative of Palin's character. Bit of a stretch to turn it into anti-Palin evidence.
"The most logical" does get bound to Enter.  "The safest," when it differs, gets bound to Escape.  More accurately "don't do anything and let me think" gets bound to Escape, which is usually the safest.  And while all the other stuff about making the stuff preceding the box logical, the box still should be there.  I work faster knowing that close-without-saving is a several-keystroke operation, as is saving over an existing file.
Have you seen pictures? The [pictures of permanent shadows](http://images.search.yahoo.com/search/images;_ylt=A0geu_FsPbtIK38BJWNXNyoA?ei=UTF-8&amp;p=permanent%20shadow%20hiroshima&amp;fr2=tab-web&amp;fr=ytff1-)?  I've seen others. Really freaky shit.   
The title of this post is misleading and so is the article.  There was NOT an up/down vote on torture like both suggest.  The vote was on an Intelligence Authorization Act for 2008, which contained many elements that McCain may have disagreed with.  
i know.  what the hell?  i think i have a brain tumor.  every time i type recently, i'm leaving out words or parts of words.
It isn't the term limits, it is that he altered the constitution illegally.  Oddly enough, in Vzla, constitutional changes only require a simple majority vote making it highly susceptible to fraud.
Could be because many of the men were in the military or at the bomb making facilities and on warships.
&gt;No. God didn't bring down hurricane Katrina because he didn't care about black people, and didn't bring down hurricane Gustav to spite the republications either.  Leave God alone already. He's not your puppet.  I think that was the point.  You need to be telling the Evangelicals to stop using God as a puppet, not us.  We're not the ones putting in tickets all the time asking him to do stuff for us, like he's some kind of call center tech.  Hell, most of us don't even believe he exists...
No. No, it's not. What obvious reason do you have for not voting for a candidate who is an atheist? I'm genuinely curious now.
IF WE KEEP SHOUTING, A HALMUNI IS SURE TO HEAR, AND FEED US!!! In my experience, they're always eager to feed someone, ANYone...
For bonus points, the now pocketed cellphone's GSM and Bluetooth radios are now an inch away from your nads.
Blasphemy!
&gt;AB→←→←↓ ↓ ↑ ↑  I want them back.
WHOOSH!
Where did I imply that?  No, I only made a direct statement about the sort of thinking that goes on in depopulist groups, as a demonstration of why *their positions* are wrong.  There's nothing "automatic" about it: make your own conclusion.  Or are you implying that killing 90% of humanity in one of the most painful, horrific, traumatic, and disgusting manners possible is a **good** thing?
I don't think a change is necessary for things to be worse.  We just need to stay on track!
Well that sure is convenient...isn't it? 
Is the GOP serious about using this line? Americans aren't smart, but they aren't THAT dumb.   I hope.
Yay, way to go stupid pro Tibetian yuppies! How many of you are still out there protesting for the "independence" of your tiny feudal theocratic microstate, now that it isn't hip anymore? If only you would have protested against it's religious regency and their people abandonned to poverty by the golden monasteries. So that's: 1. Fucked the Olympic torch relay. 2. Delayed years of efforts and struggle by the tibetian people to get free from their religious oppresors (they do live poor as dirt if you mind investigating just a bit pass "Dalai Lama is like so cool!")
Like metaphysical laughter?  I did a metaphysical laugh once. Two birds flew into my mouth and I became Jesus for exactly 31 seconds. 
Obama can feel his pain.
Wouldn't it be obvious that it would be packed? If there is only one place open then everyone who was traveling, not with their families would all be in that same place.
you havent seen very many boobs have you?
I bet I could write 100 reddit posts.
Not to be morbid here - but as a cancer survivor and POW for 5.5 years there are reasons to believe he would be more at risk than the general population.
Maybe he got a double burger.
A moose once bit my sister.
Looks like burningman, with a little more infrastructure.
dude. fuck you. you have just destroyed my life. The addiction was bad enough as it was, but now it costs $12 an hour and I can get it anywhere anytime. p.s thankyou so much   p.p.s  my precioussesesss! 
If you look closely you can see Otis the drunk.
Whew, good thing I didn't upvote.
Depends on the size of the advance.
I've bought like four Dells and then last month I had to get a present for my bro's birthday and I tried to put together another Dell on their customization page, but everything started so crappy that by the time I got it looking good, it was over $2000. Long story short, I put together an Alienware for only $1500 that isn't skimpy in any dep't. Dell isn't being very competitive.
Most anti-war statements make me just shrug and say "That's too bad", but Grave of the Fireflies had me in tears and thinking "WHY THE FUCK DO HUMANS DO THIS SHIT TO EACH OTHER!?"
They aren't trying to create democracies, they're creating puppet governments easily controlled by the bilderberg group/ council on foreign relations.
Good. It is not the penis that is oppressing the woman. I didn't say men were oppressing women. I said that they were oppressed.
She goes out and gets them herself! She knows where my wallet is, she steals a $20 and walks down to the shop. They sell her a few cans of beer (and some cigarettes). She then goes and sits at the bus stop with the other local stray dogs and drinks her beer.   Her paws aren't good at lighting the cigarettes though.
It makes a little more sense if you replace "America" with "bunch of retards"
I wish I could find an asian girl in real life :(
Thats because Democrats are spineless pussies, and the Republicans are arrogant stupid assholes.
of course not. putin can't be a prisoner in a jail he owns, now can he? because putin owns every prison in the world except for those pesky US ones.
I'd be happy with an "average" and "regular" guy. Bush, however, doesn't even make that grade.
&gt;You build a factory, you wouldn't want to have someone just come in and leech off of its productive ability, would you?  Contrary to what joeldavis says, this is not at all irrelevant.  The distinction between objects and ideas creates problems of enforcement and questions of how to compensate the inventor.  But both objects and research require an initial investment, which will only occur if the investor expects to receive a sufficient portion of its benefits.  The problems begin when patents are written broadly, used defensively, and generally over-issued.  Another example, which I think may translate to IP somewhat more easily:  You build a theme park, and sell the rights to build concession stands.  There's plenty of land along the footpaths, so there's no effective limit to the number of stands that can be built.  However, competition in your park will force you to cut prices.  If you don't enjoy the exclusive use of this land, the theme park may not be worth building.  Likewise, an invention may not be worth developing without a time-limited monopoly on its exploitation.
I think my IQ is now three points lower for having watched that clip.
I understand your sensitivity but I'm not sure it's misogynistic to point out the obvious.  I think McCain's choice of someone w/her lack of qualifications actually *engenders* sexism.  (I'm female and a feminist, btw.)
US "Naval Battle" Ships?  LOLz!
Bullfrog. RIP. May EA never Madden-ise Syndicate.  
Sometimes, hunger is just a mistaken dehydration signal.  I find keeping a pitcher of ice cold water in the fridge all the time cuts deeply into the snacking.
&gt; Yeah, racist little pricks like you sure are smart. First of all, I believe that was satire, making the point that this was the same argument they used against Obama.   But even if it was serious, while I disagree, having the opinion that Obama possibly had an advantage because of his noteworthiness as the first major black candidate, is not inherrently racist.  Just as saying that Palin was favored because she is a woman isn't inherrently sexist, if that's what the person actually thinks.  
The moose population is in collapse due to overhunting by HUMANS. Predator control is a way of saying only humans get to kill things. I am related to hunters. Some of them brag about killing any cat or dog they meet in the woods because they believe that they are the only ones who should get to kill the rabbits or deer or whatever.   What that bitch calls predator control is just an attempt to destroy ecotourism so the oil companies will be unimpeded in their destruction of one of the few natural ecosystems left. It is hard to imagine how McCain could have chosen worse.   People like Palin are just sick. They have a cruelty and a greed in their hearts that makes me ashamed we are the same species. They would consume everything on earth if they had their way. Palin is a cruel vicious bitch. 
I'm sure that'd go off real well for the Secret Service trying to protect our newly "tagged" targets.  Every nutjob in the world would have access to our political personel movements.  Assassins would be in a hoot!
You might be surprised to see how many people up here in Alaska don't care. Many of us are more concerned about the State Troopers allowing someone like Wooten continue to carry a badge and gun. 
**If true, this would be a sickening and totally unethical plan by the Repugs to make political gains by using hurricane victims.  They might be trying to get a Red Cross presence at (what's left of) their convention.**  If they do this... here's the number to call:  Red Cross line to report Ethical issues: 1-888-309-9679
I cannot tell a lie... yes.  Yes I do.
You mean Megan Fox Fans are trying to get this untalented yet very attractive woman into Dark Knight sequel.
Please no.
Again I'd like to point out ........Fuck you.
Maybe democrats are scared?  ITs the same judgemental hypocritical BS that spews from the left.  One quick example...  Several threads here and elsewhere about the "bridge to nowhere", criticism of her supporting it then not supporting it.  I seem to remember another group of politicians who voted FOR and supported something, then decided they no longer wanted to support it.  Sound familiar?  Any guesses?  Hint: its a war.
Well I've seen the opposite. I've seen that intelligence is decreasing.
If this, if that, Sarah Palin served two terms on the city council of Wasilla, AK with a population almost as large as my homeowners association.   Then won the mayors seat of the same town.  Now she has almost two years of experience as governor of Alaska, a state that has a population of approximately 690,000.  That's almost 1/6th the population of Los Angeles, CA.  1/6th!!  If these facts don't show that she has enough experience to possibly govern the USA then I don't know what to tell you. And rumor has it that she once thought about taking a trip to Sweden, which is only one country away from Russia.   edit- (just in case)I'm be sarcastic 
Much less debt than Bush and his ilk. Did Clinton have to go repeatedly to Congress begging for hundreds of billions of extra dollar?  This chart nicely shows Bush's impact on the US debt:  http://www.cedarcomm.com/~stevelm1/usdebt.htm  Too bad the Republican notion of "personal responsibility" doesn't apply to public spending.
The flaw in your argument (and the brilliance of the neocons') is that when they say "democracy" it has almost nothing to do with what you mean when you say democracy.  Democracy, as the neocons mean it, absolutely can be imposed on people at the point of a gun.  If you don't believe me, just watch your local news.  (Or, this week, read the stories of police terrorism at the conventions of both political parties.)
This is a second posting about this subject. The original one is here:  http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/6yxdv/palin_laughs_as_opponent_is_called_bitch_cancer/
No where in our primal existence were women oppressed into the position of being nothing more than breeders. That is an absolutely bogus statement that has been designed in the modern era purely to justify the enslavement of women by the ruling class to the subordinate role of a commodity.  Society has, yes, given the mandate, however not in that it told men, "You are of higher status." The intention is not to empower men at all. It was done in a way that told women, "You are of even lower status than that of the men."
Americans have no right to judge - look at how many taser deaths you have each months
and [teeth](http://www.wired.com/medtech/health/news/2008/04/tooth_regeneration)
[Geographers and cartographers agree that neither map projection (Mercator or Gall-Peters) is appropriate for use as a map of our planet.](http://geography.about.com/library/weekly/aa030201a.htm) Mercator is still good for small distance maps, and the Dymaxion map has the advantage of being able to be folded into a globe once you're bored of looking at the Earth flat, and the Robinson projections can represent the Earth relatively decently.
http://www.wunderground.com/wundermap/?lat=28.26568&amp;lon=-88.43994&amp;zoom=7&amp;type=hyb&amp;rad=0&amp;wxsn=0&amp;svr=0&amp;cams=0&amp;sat=1&amp;sat.num=8&amp;sat.spd=25&amp;sat.opa=85&amp;sat.gtt1=109&amp;sat.gtt2=108&amp;sat.type=IR4&amp;riv=0&amp;mm=0&amp;hur=1&amp;hur.wr=0&amp;hur.cod=1&amp;hur.fx=1&amp;hur.obs=1&amp;hur.hd=0&amp;hur.opa=70&amp;hur.img=0&amp;fire=0&amp;tor=0
That was a secret?
Well, it's still interesting. This poll includes Friday - which means it includes people who saw Obama's speech, and were aware of McCain's pick. It represents two points less for Obama than the day before.  Make of it what you will, but it's still interesting to see what moves the numbers and what doesn't, and how much.
&gt;The fact is most commercial pet foods are made from less than human quality ingredients?  Considering they are animals and not humans... I wouldn't expect that they have "human quality" ingredients.  Seriously, they are dogs... my dog eats napkins and anything else he can find in the trash, not to mention his own throw-up on occasions.  
Another problem with the Windows example is that it also has a little red close button in the top corner. It's superfluous, no?
Never.  Don't want Muslims in my country until Islam-dominant countries open their doors to non-Muslims.
fucking pwned!
I have driven an hour to go to an ER in a rich, suburban area, to avoid being stuck for hours in a crowded urban hospital, where I didn't know a single doctor.  I'm not saying I'm rich (I'm not), and obviously the time scale is different...I'm just saying that if you aren't in immediate danger it is PERFECTLY reasonable/common to make the decision to travel further to get to a doctor you are familiar with, or to a hospital that you think will offer you better care.  I think women usually have their hospital picked out months in advance, so if she knew she had time to get there, what's wrong with her traveling 8 hours to be in a comfortable place in her home town, that she was familiar with?  Assuming that the time of birth was fixed, she would have otherwise spent 12 hours in a hospital in a strange town, with a bunch of doctors she didn't know.  If I were a woman, and in her place, I would have been thinking that whole time "I could have gotten on a plane and been back home by now."  You guys keep making me feel like I have to explain that I'm a Democrat, and have no ideological alignment with her whatsoever, but since no one is playing devil's advocate here, I just want to point this stuff out.
Leave Britney alone!
just don't go to retarded coffee shops.  and don't order retarded drinks.  It's not hard to order a "large coffee" or "medium latte"
What a vicious curr! 
*And* the closest to the Russki's, don't fergit that!
Reading the comments here I have to wonder about the average age and intelligence of Redditers. Are many of you pre-pubescent, pimply morons? 
That's completely true and I agree with it... but... that's only if you are defining intelligence only as exactly how we conceive of it.  I fully believe there might be a machine-borne intelligence alive today.  A machine-borne intelligence will, by default, be incomprehensible to us.  It will not be aware of us.  It will not reproduce, there would be no point to that.  It does not need to spread out and acquire carbon based stuff to eat.  The very concept of communication to a singular organism is very bizarre.  Why would it develop a capacity to communicate with us or even amongst itself?
Drop acid and watch eraserhead with a loaded gun in your hand.  If you live, you've got no problems.
Urethra is the new Uterus
&gt;Shipping companies are already planning to exploit the first simultaneous opening of the routes since the beginning of the last Ice Age 125,000 years ago  something tells me there weren't many shipping companies back then
I'm torn between an empty headed Homer Simpson, "Doo dee doo daa da." and "Soon I will control and kill all that stands before me."
Extremely intense orgasms they don't remember.  You wish girls loved to be date raped.
One simple sign that you missed the entire point of your own religion.
&gt; "Sugar and sodium are not mind-altering substances. They may affect your body's systems in a way that eventually alters your mood ..., but they don't directly effect your brain chemistry.  Untrue.  Ask any college biology major and they'll tell you a billion ways how sugar and sodium levels very directly and fundamentally alter your brain chemistry.  I'm not saying sugar and sodium are "drugs" in the street sense, but I'm saying your classification system is an invalid determinant. 
sounds stupid
I can understand dropping a nuke on a threat but I have a slight problem with dropping a bomb just to show our power.  Sure it worked....we proved that we were dirtier than the japanese at the time.....We earned respect and fear from villains. Great job.
Agreed! Everyone wants to be Mother Mindfuck and tell us what we think. What a bunch of assholes.
reminds me of this picture of a beef wallet i saw earlier:[eww](http://farm2.static.flickr.com/1097/1416578012_4e542ef12e.jpg?v=0)  EDIT: *******LINK NSFW**********
And with that comment, you're clearly filling in for him :-)
I can't wait until their heads grow so big that they get stuck.
you're most certainly an avid advocate of "common courtesy"
I suppose that's fair to say since there's no objective distinction, the use of the word 'far' is relative.  Compared to McCain's brand of conservatism libertarianism is to the right.  I have a question for you.  Of Fascism or Libertarianism, which is further right?
We love the Leader   na-na-na-na-na LEADER!
The Palin pick is obviously an attempt to please the fundie base and pick up testicle-chomping Hillary supporters but fails on both counts. 
No, chocolate chip pancakes make people violent.  Read the studies, man!
What makes you think he only has two wives? He might be this guy:  http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/africa/7591037.stm
you need the [xp patch](http://www.dice.nl/Trouble/C&amp;CRA_Patch.zip)   seriously, if you dont trust the direct link, it comes from [here](http://www.dice.nl/Trouble/trouble_C&amp;CRA.htm) (this site has the instructions too)  and here's [the torrent](http://thepiratebay.org/torrent/4354709/red_alert_windows_xp_patch)
"That sheep was totally making eyes at me, your honor!"
&gt; We can have 1 trillion people here living perfectly normal.....because..you said so?  The word you're looking for is called "[arcology](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Arcology)".  We have not yet begun to implement these principles. But of course, as populations increase, this **will** happen.  Secondarily, for the first time in recorded human history, the majority of humans now live in an urban setting.  This, my friend, is what you call a "trend".  Combine that trend with the also-existent trend towards so-called skyscraper farms and the real effort towards cultured meats, and the ecological impact per-person will dramatically reduce.  Of course, even a cursory examination of current trends would reveal these things.  But holding to malthusian doomsaying that even Thomas Malthus himself disagreed with, that have been wrong for going on two centuries now, is more popular.  Enjoy it while it lasts.
Enough with the "upmod if" submissions.  You're missing the point.
I turned you down?
I have a Visa and M/C here in Japan and they actively discourage revolving credit here even though it would probably be a big money-spinner. Every month the banks automatically withdraw my total credit card balance from one of my savings accounts.  If someone wants to not pay the whole bill in one payment you have to tell the cashier at the time that you want to pay by revolving credit over 2 or 3 or 4 or 5 or 6 months.   As a credit card customer you have really no flexibility as to how much of your bill you want to pay when the bill arrives.
People are in denial because they want to *use* their mobile phones. The same way that people that drive SUVs convince themselves that they are "safe" when really they just want to drive a big car.
Waves of sickening nausea overcame the septuagenarian  as he waded through the filthy crowd of proles. 
u negro, u.
Japanese atrocities have been portrayed on film - even in a Japanese made movies: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BGPMEtfEKMY  I can't really watch this right now and find out if it's a good one to submit, because I have a 4 year old in the room, but search "men behind the sun" and submit something if you want equal time.
My springer will pick up a beer bottle and tip it up in his mouth - slurping the lot in a few seconds given half a chance. He's mental for Jack D. too, his back legs lose coordination when he's pissed.  (don't try this at home kids, alcohol is very, very bad for your dog!) chocolate and raisons are even more toxic.
The Science subreddit is one of the most popular. 
I don't think it's sexist that this sort of thing could never happen to a man.
KGB is specifically an example of (an elite within) the state watching the state.  KGB surveillance of Soviet politicians didn't make them honest, it made the KGB fat with blackmail secrets, and powerful in its ability to accuse.  When you weaken politicians, you might be getting something worse.
Please tell me that was a joke...
Is putin the next chuck norris?
Athiests are all Satanists and they will BURN IN HELL for not believing in God.  They will also BURN IN HELL for not believing in the Tooth Fairy, Santa Claus, and the Easter Bunny.
Honestly, I think the coverage was just fine.  The worst thing possible would be the glamorize those assholes by putting their faces all over the news.  Studies have shown time and time and time again that highly publicizing crime leads to MORE crime, not less. Tell the public they were a bunch of hopped-up meth-headed retards and let that be the end of it.  The more foolish they are made to look, the less likely the next psychotic gloryhound decides to emulate them. REAL security happens in the dark.  Anything in the public light is theater, one way or another.
Can't prove it is propaganda, but i would call it likely. He probably did tranq the cat, but probably didn't save the tv crew by doing so.  The fact that he tranqed the the cat rather then killed sounds suspicious. Good news reporters/investigators might look into this.
Executive power of a 700,000 population state. Nice!
That BS invalidated itself in only TEN words!  That's astonishing!  10 words in and it pulls out the nonsense word "toxins" and revealed itself to be unadulterated, super-concentrated BULLSHIT!
The problem is the question of whether more humane methods are more acceptable, whether the lives of hundreds of thousands of military people, who have signed up, ready to die, are worth more than millions of civilians who simply want to be left alone.  And yet it is so much more complex than that, so many arguments, what is wrong, what is right. Are you the good guy for protecting 100,000 of your own men who have trusted you and are ready to die for you, or 1,000,000 civvies who have done nothing and sworn to kill noone.  It is a highly complex argument around something so totally simple -- throughout history, people have revolved around killing each other, but the real question, surely is whether we are at a point where we can change this?
I think so. I think people see themselves reflected in tee shirts more than they think it is about you.
"Results 1 - 10 of about 1,420"  sigh
A Jewish friend told me his grandfather would say moo shoo pork was kosher on Christmas.
OK, I am going to actually defend Starbucks here. Or maybe just explain, I fully agree the pseudo-Italian size names are absurd, but they have to call them something.  They have 4 sizes. Which one is the "medium"?  I work PT at a coffee shop, we also have 4 sizes. Personally, I think this is not worth the trouble. People understand 3 sizes. Small, medium, large. 3 sizes! Easy! But, I am not the boss.  We call them "tiny," "small", "medium," "large" with the amounts clearly labeled so 50% of people and most regulars just order "12oz." or whatever. But for everyone else it's kind of confusing, which one is "small" and which "medium"? The physical cups are prominently displayed with their size names, but it's still very counterintuitive for some folks to order "small" for the cup that's not the smallest.  Starbucks has solved this problem. "Short," "tall," "grande," "venti." Starbucks has ubiquity so everyone just learns these, and from then on, everyone's life is easier. Orders go faster, people know what they are getting with confidence. It's all about efficiency and accuracy.  If one day Starbucks wants to add a 5th size, they can call it an Enormi and we can all keep on trucking. In fact, they have already done this -- they didn't use to have a venti, and the short used to be up on the menu. (Now you just have to know it's there somehow, like "animal style" at In-n-Out.)  With that said I fully endorse you fucking around with them, that's hilarious and deserved.  And why do they call a caramel latte a macchiato, that is just indefensible!
The basic flaw in this article is that is assumes that democratization is an actual goal of the neocons. 
Quit go through you second day of withdrawal from cigarettes.  Angrily blame any unpleasant symptoms on your ex girlfriend dumping you. 
The democrats share blame for all debt incurred while they control the house.
It's still helpful to find if the book succeeded for them. If I'm a beginner it's valuable to know if other beginners were aided by a book.
DOES HE LOOK LIKE A BITCH?!?
I have to disagree, as an Irish man I find it oddly a relief when I find a famous actor I like is actually Canadian. Like it or not but it's quite unpopular to be American "anywhere" outside America right now. The thing is though; you know how to fix it, and McCain isn't the Answer.
I fucking hate polio.
David Blaine take that!
I don't get the constant mention of "hospital wait times" in reference to Canadian healthcare. Are there some miraculous hospitals somewhere *without* ridiculous wait times?  My girlfriend just went to the doctor's office (here in the United States) last week and waited 2.5 hours for a 15 minute appointment that cost $200. I was once I hit by a car walking across the road, and waited 2 hours to see an ER doctor who did nothing make a joke about how thin I am, then left. Charged my insurance agency $300.  I find it hard to believe Canada is markedly worse than this.
I was zooming out and then the final picture loaded and I kinda sat up in my seat.
Gee, nice way to slant your info. Palin has 12 years of executive experience (10 as mayor, 2 as Governer.  Obama has NONE. Military Affairs experience - Palin is Commander of the Alaska National Guard and has a son who will be heading to Iraq shortly.  Obama has none. Honor/Ethics - Palin resigned in protest from position of Ethics Commissioner of Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission in order to expose legal violations and conflicts of interest of Alaska Republican leaders, including the former state Attorney General and the State GOP Chairman (who was also an Oil &amp; Gas Commissioner), who was doing work for the party on public time and supplying a lobbyist with a sensitive e-mail.   Obama announced his candidacy from the home of a domestic terroist. Palin was a union member and is married to a union member.  Obama receives support from the unions. Legislative Record:  Palin Passed a landmark ethics reform bill; Used veto to cut budgetary spending;  Prevented "bridge to nowhere" that would have cost taxpayers $400 million dollars.  Obama voted "present" over 100 times as state senator. Earmarks:  Palin Opposed "Bridge to Nowhere" project; Said Alaska should avoid relying on federal money for projects; Campaigned against porker Don Young (R-AK) in 2008 primary  Obama- Secured federal earmarks for wife's employer and for campaign bundlers Palinn belives energy independence is a matter of national security and support drilling in ANWAR.  Obama thinks we should all drive less and inflate our tires (becuase we all know that every single tire is under inflated.) So even, no... I think Palin walks the walk while Obama is all talk.
-.-;;   Since 1953, Atlantic tropical storms have been named from lists made by the National Hurricane Center.  According to the National Hurricane Center, the use of short, distinctive names in both written and spoken communication is quicker and less subject to error than the older latitude-longitude identification methods.  The original lists were composed entirely of female names. In 1979, male names were introduced and now alternate with female names alphabetically.  The six lists of names are used in rotation, so the list used in 2008 will again be used in 2014. The lists are maintained and updated by an international committee of the World Meteorological Organization.  The only situation in which the list is changed is if a storm is so costly or deadly that using that name for a future storm would be inappropriate for reasons of sensitivity. In such a case, the WMO committee will strike the name from their lists at their annual meeting and replace it with another name.  2005, in particular, was a rough year for tropical storms, with five names being retired, including Dennis, Katrina, Rita, Stan and Wilma.  Since 1953, 67 names have been stricken from the lists. Several names have also been changed since the lists were made. For example, in 2004, Gaston replaced Georges and Matthew replaced Mitch.  The lists contain 21 names each year. Should more than 21 tropical storms occur in a season, additional storms will take names from the Greek alphabet: Alpha, Beta, Gamma, etc. 2005 marked the first time in over 60 years of regularly-named Atlantic storms that all 21 regular names were used and the Greek system had to be employed. Tropical Storm Zeta was sixth Greek-named storm of the year and brought 2005’s final tally to a record 27 tropical storms.
Americans love a good rebel, but you can't really be one when you work for (or are) the people that rebels are supposed to rebel against? It might be different (I doubt it) if the politicians did this stuff openly instead of trying to hide it and act like they're a saint.
I did it.
To be honest, the only sports game I play is Tony Hawk - and that hasn't been good in awhile.  Other than that I play Madden when I go to my cousin's for hollidays during football season - so twice a year.  Other than I just hear good reviews from the people that like those games.  I personally prefer games like F.E.A.R., C&amp;C RA, etc.
Neigh.
Yet. But she is under state investigation. And has already lied to us.
does obama or mccain try to convert people? I didn't think they do, yet theyre both religious.
JFYI not every statement regarding a woman's gender is misogyny (I know it's shocking!).  And if you honestly don't think McCain chose her for her gender, then you're completely blind.
Politics subreddit, please.
I guess everyone has their good points.
And everyone will travel there on a really short bus.
Obviously, the treaty was broken.  Maybe Nixon used it for toilet paper.  I stand by my statement.
They *could* change it so that people made their bids simultaneously, but that's a hallmark of the show. I think the format is fine the way it is. It's strategic for the guy to bid $2001. So don't hate the player, hate the game.
They share blame, yes. Pelosi is a leader who, like Bush, needs to be replaced. The Democrats, however, didn't lie to kick off the spending extravaganza that is the Iraq war. It is Bush's leadership which led to the massive increase in public debt.
You run around and cum on [random girls](http://www.efukt.com/212_Walk_By_Cumshot_3.html).
IT'S GONNA RAIN
I am in utter shock at some of the comments I am reading here.
You lose "guy" status simply by asking this question. A real man's bathroom is carpeted. No, not carpeted with real carpet but months of accumulated pubic hair and dust bunnies. This protects the actual floor from urine spots while simultaneously absorbing the water that drips after you step out of the shower. Time will form it into a matted layer that can be conveniently torn off in appropriate sized chunks for use as TP should you ever find yourself stranded. Also, if you are ever lucky enough to have a woman come to visit, just roll up the mat beforehand to reveal your spotless floor. She will be quite impressed when she uses your bathroom (and she will to "check" you out, not to use actual bathroom). Replace the man-mat after she leaves. The measure of a man is the thickness of his man-mat. If mice cannot tunnel without going unnoticed you are still a padawan learner, my friend.
Well, I don't know, all I see is a table with a bunch of tools, some PCBs, and energy drinks, and what looks like an LCD monitor housed in an aluminum case. Really, it would take a video demonstration would lower my cynicism of this project. All this shows is that they know how to make a mess and drink Red Bull.
A Mexican Pizza appears.  Do you want (H)ot, (M)ild, or (F)ire sauce with that?
Why is this news? Who cares about this shit?
Have 100 experts perform their 20 best tricks, then have the other 99 rate them.Then perform some type of evaluation looking for commanalities in the highest ranking tricks. Then  the flight controller can combine those common elements in unique ways. 
well, except for the vapid sorority chicks that seem to frequent the place.
Yeah, it was definitely written in the most confusing style possible. Odd that this is coming from a real newspaper.
Uh, you could try and go the 'whole hog' and become a nullo, like this guy:   http://forum.ebaumsworld.com/archive/index.php/t-187990.html
Why would you be afraid people would think you're gay? If you aren't, you aren't. Just because the tee shirt says "I *heart* midget porn", doesn't mean he really loves midget porn.  Just like the people who wear FBI shirts...doesn't mean they are from the FBI. Not that there's anything wrong with that.  Edit: quotes
You sure that wasn't an RC space shuttle?
Sure, Warner Bros. needs my money more than I do - at least to hear them tell it!
if you didn't pick up on the fact that the pledge was NOT written by the "founding fathers" back when the whole "under god" controversy was storming, you're probably a vegetable
My favorite instance of this is manipulating xml via string concatenation and regexps. If I find out you are doing this, I will find you (oh yes, I will find you), and I will **kill you**. In the coroner's report, they will describe your body as being "malformed".
It's not the actual incident, rather that redditors (as a group) seem to love bashing female politicians and giving a (mostly) free-pass to the equally stupid, self-serving and deceptive male politicians that dominate the US. This post (effectively another repeat post on the same issue) is simply a symptom of that sexism, which they're in denial about (as seen by the downvotes). Has there been any female politicians who have had the jock-carrying obsequiousness that RP, Obama, Kucinich have had on reddit?  
&gt;I think Sarah is a very good strategic move on McCain`s part.  What do you think of her as a potential president should something happen to McCain? In his strategy, do you think that McCain put the country above his election or election first?
Good point, lets submit it to VPilf.com
fuckstick
It is pretty clear that Bush did not invade Iraq because of God, and as you said its an excuse, so how is that relevant? People who use religion as an excuse to do bad things won't suddenly start doing good things if they can't use it as an excuse anymore. They'll just find a new excuse.
Knowledge, ability and power to effect. Applying these attributes to any and all humans, not just one.  And yes, if you find yourself in a cheetah's territory then it would be superior and you would be lunch. :-)
http://na.llnet.cnc3tv.ea.com/u/f/eagames/cnc3/cnc3tv/RedAlert/RedAlert1_AlliedDisc.rar
Or maybe the mass murder in Iraq. Just a guess.
Of course the library director is not comparable to the secretary of defense. The police chief is the secretary of defense.
I'm sure the turtles would be calling this abuse.
Whatever  I'm kind of drunk now, no spirit to build a reply.  Drink/Puke/Go to sleep
Don't talk to me about strawberry jam. My mother used to keep it in the cupboard, high up where I couldn't reach it.  I was always bitter about the fact that only when we had adult guests was it ever taken out and passed around and could we kids have any?  "It's just for adults dear" she'd say and no other explanation.  Had I known the damage it can do at that time, maybe I wouldn't have piled one chair on top of another to get it.  Maybe I wouldn't take some out and replace it with hair gel, hoping nobody would notice.  How am I supposed to know?  I was just a kid! It ruined my life.  First it was strawberry jam.  Then I moved on to jellies and marmalades.  Before I knew it, I was buying expensive 'organic' jams and jellies from overseas and eventually became a dealer myself, importing and distributing cases of delicious jams.  Sure, it was fun for a while but first the teeth started falling out and I gained 800 pounds.  I had a habit that exceeded anything I could make off it and eventually went broke.  I had to beg on the street to raise enough money to make my own but it never turned out the same!  It was about then I took a hard look at myself and started to pick myself back up out of the gutter.  My only regret is that I am no longer able to eat toast.  Too many bad memories.   
Somehow I think it would have been much worse. 
Please elaborate.
I think that Epic Thread is the masterpiece of Reddit. A hundred years from now, when people look back and wonder why a website called Reddit was cool at all, they will be shown the epic thread. And their minds will be boggled.
the mojitos are to die for, and the cohibas are brutal
I'm not your friend buddy!
I'm turtle-headin', dad!
and by god he means the recursive nature of a data structure set into motion
A softball 1 on 1 interview where all the questions were vetted ahead of time and she was prepped for a day by handlers. How am I supposed to be impressed by this?
my god, i love people not getting sarcastic flow charts
That's the point.  If you claim "This is a myth" you need to back it up.  Your other option is to admit that you are talking out your ass.
Python's setuptools is the same way, although you can use it without requiring it at runtime. Still, I prefer Makefiles, which also have the added bonus of being able to build and install things that are not Python.
&gt; how do you figure there is no overpopulation problem? where is this evidence to support "roughly 1 trillion people"  Addressed in another comment.  Go do your basic-level homework, 'k?  &gt; you can find articles for either side about the polar bears drowing off or at record level populations....but here's one from nasa that supports the fact that they are dying off and a quote: " According to scientists from NASA and the Canadian Wildlife Service, these increased Arctic polar bear sightings are probably related to retreating sea ice triggered by climate warming and not due to population increases as some may believe."  The total number of individual bears has increased and is set to continue increasing.  There's nothing you can do to contradict that.  &gt; Here's one from Time stating that the ice caps are melting  Time? *Time*?  Bullshit.  [Try the NSIDC.](http://wattsupwiththat.files.wordpress.com/2008/08/ddw82wws_13dbt97vdf_b.jpg) You know, **an actual authority on the issue**?  Furthermore, "the ice caps" were **never** "melting".  Last year saw a record *high* for the Southern polar cap.  The northern cap was supposed to be ice-free this year, and instead we are seeing a total reversal of the 30-year trend; a year where the ice level was higher at end-melt than it was the year previous.  &gt; or how about the chicago tribune just recently talking about sea ice in the arctic ocean being at its second lowest level in about 30 years................  Just how blind are you, son?  Last year was the absolute lowest point.  I did not contest this.  You imply that it being at the second-lowest in about thirty years seems to imply that it is still receding.  And I just got done stating that the current sea ice extent minimum was a **reversal of the trend**.  This is a total irrelevancy which has already been addressed; but tell me, how would you account for the fact that there is in fact more ice this year than last year?  &gt; give me some links for reference to prove your point.....  You seem to be good enough at finding the run-of-the-mill bullshit, why don't you do your own research and actually go straight to the sources?  &gt; never heard of dr pianka till now....i dont agree with his view...nor do i give a shit....my point was that idiots breed....  And my point was that when you start talking about who gets killed off, you set aside all humanity and liberty in the favor of fascism and hate.  For a purpose that is absolutely useless.  No, thank you.
Yes, in order to take focus away from the RNC, God is bringing horrible destruction to the people of New Orleans... again. This makes perfect sense to me as I am an evangelical Christian.
My first car was an old 1968 Porsche 912 Targa. I never called it Por-sche with two syllables.  Just the one. 
Well, if people stopped linking to him, he might have to find a real job and stop spouting off...
 &gt; fire sauce
yeah, because everyone knows the best coffee is from Milan and Paris.  If you're going to be elitist about your coffee, at least mention a place actually known for producing coffee.  That's like claiming that something isn't the same way the Swiss prepare Thai food.
HeIsInLoveWithTheSoundOfHisOwnVoice
Fuck Yeah AMERICAN GALDIATORS!
Russia just called the West's bluff.  SUCK IT DOWN!
good news reporters/investigators in Russia have a habit of falling to death out windows. Or being shot while being arrested.
Sorry but it's the truth. Public radio, surprisingly, pays well.
Here's a table from the U.S. National Center for Health Statistics that does that:  age  years    0   77.8   10   78.5   20   78.8   30   79.3   40   79.9   50   80.9   60   82.5   70   85.2   80   89.1 
&gt;Gov. Palin has a history of attacking establishment figures head-on, and defeating them.   Really? What has she done to stop corruption in Alaska since her election as governor? Lots of federal investigations and indictment, but I don't know of anything from the state. Oh, did you mean firing "establishiment figures" for getting in the way of her family or for not working for her re-election?  &gt;Although 9/10's of women elect to have an abortion in those cases, Palin kept her child, which has been an inspiration to women and families across the country.  How is it inspiring to do make a different choice from 90% of the population? I suspect that most of that 90% think it shows that she has misguided priorities.  &gt;She instituted reform, and in LESS THAN TWO YEARS she's reformed the Alaskan economy.  How? Please be specific.  &gt;and she knows foreign policy. Wikipedia her, you'll see her in Germany and Istanbul.  Oh, you are trolling.
It's pure Qualye.  Pander to the right fundies, insult everyone else.
I love the fact that adults can have imaginary friends.
Don't waste the water, just chuck them out the window.
I believe you mean almniotic fluid.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sousveillance
sure, thats a fair comparison.  Listing Obama's education and all his employment, however Palin's education and relevant employment is strangely absent.  If your trying to make a point, it helps to use non-biased sources, or else you just look like a brain dead partisan.  Oh and on a side note he was ELECTRONICALLY voted in.  See what I did there?
vote up if you think this article is a fucking waste of time. it's called VOTING you idiots.
Do they all wear parachute pants?
I didn't say there will be no interference with democracy. I merely disagree with your statement that "the US isn't *currently* operating" as one. 
Because strawberry jam companies don't pay huge bribes to politicians, uh, I mean, make donations to campaigns.
Even if Blackwater wanted to do this, they'd be insane to try.  How much money would you demand to stand against the police? (hint: don't do it)
Yes, that's what I meant.
Bush is enthusiastic about endangered species, too.  He's enthusiastic about finishing them off.
On the other hand, McCain **WAS A PRISONER OF WAR!!!1**
Saturn or Jupiter. If they don't floor you the first time you see them your in the wrong hobby
heh, I majored in mathematical economics with a concentration in computational finance, and even *I* fucking loathe finance.
C'mon, I want to know!  I won't make fun of you!
is that a threat!?
Works for me, including any variant of "vote/upmod this if"...
Japan had already learned its lesson, and had already agreed to surrender.  But japan wanted conditional surrender and joint negotiations with the U.S., Japan and Russia.  Mostly, Japan wanted the safety of the emperor guaranteed.  Russia, meanwhile was fast snapping up Chinese territory taken by Japan.  Every day before a surrender was negotiated meant a bigger Russia and a smaller China.  Hiroshima was the first casualty of the cold war.  
I'm not pro-life myself, but you don't really address it at all.  Correct or not, pro-life people believe that unborn babies are equal to those already born, therefore they see it as murder.  If you believe something is murder, "a woman's right over her own body" sounds like a pretty retarded thing to say.  Address the issue of abortion = murder, then you might get somewhere.
It's *comedy*, bozo.
"Fire sauce!" you shout.  You hear the sound of a cannon and turn just in time to take the blast, full-on. You are now covered in sauce.
I can't go into Carl's Jr. anymore without coming up with an excuse to say "Fuck you, I'm eating" to someone (in my monster-truck rally voice).  I get some weird looks.
You don't find her record of decision making of importance? 
[As this video explains quite clearly.](http://www.collegehumor.com/video:1791939)
I'm not defending her.  You can't read can you.  I am saying that the claim she fired the people for "vengeful political reasons" is unsubstantiated bullshit. I don't like 80% of her positions.  But how I feel about her is irrelevant to the fact that some other asshole is making unsubstantiated accusations at her, and I'm calling him on his bullshit.  In such a case I will defend somebody I don't like just as much as I'd defend someone I do.  Anyone who isn't willing to stand up for the truth, regardless of personal agenda, are pieces of shit in my book.
It's not hypocritical at all. It's a sacrifice you could choose to make, for the privilege of serving your community. If you aren't interested in leadership or are more interested in your privacy, then find another vocation.
fap fap fap
i don't think you understand ... the game is not over yet so you can not compare the totals of ww1 and ww2 to ww3 ... we are just in the beginning stages of ww3, the odds are that by the time all is said and done ww3 will have killed more than the first two combined ... and no one is robbing anyone .. there is no comparison ... ww3 will mean nukes so remember, "Duck and Cover"
Don't worry, it happ to all of us.
Maybe more people were praying for rain in the south instead?
what are you going to do, impeach him?
The democrats could have stopped it.  They did not.
It isn't. People who want a free market system go around looking for the rare case to trumpet.  Our health care system more or less works. The real issue we face is that costs are escalating quickly, partly because we have to pay huge salaries to doctors to keep them from going to the US.
It was the infinite solution.  Also, I like pi.
Better get the ACLU.
huh?
this was probably made in Canada or another non-US country. Americans get offended and upset in these situations. everyone else outside of the USA just laugh like normal people.
Really? It looked like a turtle getting a human into a very unlikely limb-lock to me.
Yeah, what he said.
It's only been a few days and I'm already tired of hearing  about:  A.) This woman B.) daily kos articles that cry about it.
Believe me, we know we aren't popular right now. We're working on that.
My God, she doesn't have a good understanding of the history of the pledge of allegiance?! How can she possibly be vice president?
  &gt;scrape sauce off self with spork.
small, medium, large, extra large.  Sorry to totally destroy your theory.  It was a good thought though!
... or was it a case of incest? These are Republicans we're talking about.
The fact is that the acts go way beyond the assination of a president or sleazy stealing of votes. These are acts of treason resulting in the certain prolongation of the war in Vietnam resulting in the deaths of tens of thousands of americain soldiers as a result. The failure to prosecute or at least officially examine the evidence is sadly evidence that there is absolutely no accountability before law in this country for this priviledged political entity.   -if there was any real justice in this country, somebody should have charged and have been tried for treason-nothing less. One could be sure if that happened, the GOP operatives would think twice and edit their playbook.   
why does sarah palin wear hoop earrings? so she has somewhere to rest her ankles.
Not quite, but impressive :).  Edit: Runs much better in Safari. 
Yes. So you see - today the rules of war have changed.  Before - it was OK to target civilians - but now, it's not ok to target civilians - because we can make weapons which give us the ability to claim that we don't target civilians, but alas, sometimes terrible things just happen... a lot. As a result of these weapons, it is now no longer acceptable to target civilians.  So you see, if you cannot afford to purchase our humane weapons, or we refuse to sell them to you, then just ensure that you do not hurt any civilians - because NOW it is immoral and we’ll call you a “coward” - especially when you kill yourself when killing the civilians – this is a very, very “cowardly act”.  Got it?! Good.
No.
I knew people would start to discover negative impacts of wind. Just not this soon.
He was going to visit the troops but changed his mind when he found out he couldn't bring reporters with him.
Yes. A *SEARCH* warrant. NOT an *ARREST* warrant...
[[AAAAAAAAA!](http://uncyclopedia.org/wiki/AAAAAAAAA)]
Are you trying to tell me that she would laugh at jokes about her enemy's personality and politics, but that she would would not appreciate jokes regarding her children's medical conditions? Your claims are outrageous and unfounded. Good day, sir.
I love the custom icons. They are so dumb and yet so awesome.
Look at the main page-or anywhere else on Reddit- and it's clear we have an obvious bias.(towards Obama, or against Mccain, but a bias nonetheless)  Doesn't this make us no better than conservatively biased news networks like Fox?
That's alright. Because unlike you we don't have serious issues. See, we didn't read into his article anything about US getting money from HIM. We just read into it that he at least pretends to be humble.   You added all that subtext yourself, which tells us a lot about you and your pathetic self image.
Aww...further motivation for me to pursue a career in social services.  Thank you!
More like the Lyin' Lion of Zion(ism).
You might as well be wearing this one: http://www.amazon.com/Mod-Target-Adult-T-Shirt-Size/dp/B0014UG9OG/ref=sr_1_2?ie=UTF8&amp;s=apparel&amp;qid=1220232079&amp;sr=1-2 
Twice a single
Maybe military aggression isn't a good thing, period.  If all these countries didn't have standing armies for the assholes they elect to use...
I just walk round being a cunt to everyone, but I want to be an Exec one day.
Man or not, we thoroughly plan to laugh her out of politics. 
Fuck! I hade it wen peepol try an 'Fred' me. Makez me waunt to Spit! Ptooooweeee! 
Writ large?
Going to take alot more than that to cease my drug-use. 
And people say Black makes you look thinner. This evidence clearly proves that hypothesis wrong!  Down with Colorists! Down with black! Fashionistas be damned!
Ah, the delightful "you're another" response. I sure hope you don't try to complain about someone else doing this. 
Jupiter is very bright in the southern sky right now. You will be able to see its four large moons and even some detail on the planet itself.  The Moon is pretty impressive too. I second the suggestion of checking out heavens-above.com. One of the best beginning astronomy books I recommend is Terrence Dickinson's "Nightwatch."  Do you live in an urban area with lots of light pollution, or do you have semi-dark to dark rural skies? 
I last heard this track five or six years ago. I think I will wait another five or six years before I listen to it again.
Darn, Gustav went over Cuba, but didn't get trapped in Guantanamo Bay!
He was just looking for a womb with a view.
Will Smith is such a dude, I'd love to meet him one day.
Spare?
A government big enough to protect us from corporate abuse is big enough to protect a corporation from competition.
And for what? What do they accomplish besides brainwashing &amp; extorting the people into submission? An atheist president would sympathize with the masses rather than the masters. 
Sarah Palin's making up for lost time.
It's not comedy if it's not funny, Einstein.
Is this the part where I say "rape isn't funny" and you say "women have no sense of humour" ?  I can never remember....
